Sony Xperia E@@@Worst mobile from Sony. Please buy brands like Micromax, XOLO or Gionee instead of Xperia E. Its really really slow.
flipkart delivery is fast...product i got was in good condition,product also is good,no problem yet faced with product(sony Xperia E.about price no need to say...its less than market price.overall awsome experience with flipkart till today....
awesome phone worth money.. if you are planning to buy phone in this range then please buy xperia E for sure its a awesome product and very awesome phone
I loved the phone....its very fast though I xpected it to lag while using multiple apps. Its very compact and handy
Hi.I am using sony xperia E single sim..this mobile good but it lack many times while playing games,attending phone calls even using internet also. -->Here,Many features are available but everything is not good,Even touch also sometime lack. ---> If once i switch off and on it will take more than 10 min to return back for normal stage. --->Audio is too good..but video some of the video formats are not supported.. --->About camera quality , I think it's worst. Even samsung s5202 Java apps phone have same 3.2 mp camera . But sony xperia camera images not good. --->About Internet, It somewhat fast in Opera mini,but google chrome and other browser are getting slow. Compare with this Samsung packet pro Rs.4380 work fine. --->Finally, If want to buy android phone in sony ,you will prefer for above Rs.13000 like sony M,L..but this price you please dont prefer this phone..If you want to buy a android phone for this price you just look samsung,Nokia Lumia...
the phone is working fine without any disturbances, best phone for that price. it is very handy to use.
I have been using the phone for last couple of weeks and have faced following problems 1. Heating-the phone gets quite hot while using or charging, I am unable to pick calls at times as it practically hurts the ears. 2. The touchpad is not good and very small so many times some other key is pressed. 3. I have not installed many softwares, and i do not use the phone for gaming so can't really say much about processor or graphics respoonse. 4. The battery backup is quite poor. 5. The heating problem is severe and always using headset is not comfortable. The pro are 1. Its from sony and doesn't look too shabby 2. The headset available with the phone is good. Conclusion - I would not recommend you to buy this item as many better options are available for far less price. And if you have already brought it... Join the group..
I by this mobile on flipkart 5 months ago. I say it is the worst mobile in Sony android smartphones series. Camera is not good at night, itcan play all games but gives more laggy performance while playing games. When I installed some apps it was hanged much time. So I will uninstall that apps.it's processor is too weak.Am a big games lover. It will pleases temple run, angry Bairds, subway surfers, dead trigger.I can play this games more lagging performance. It canot supported riptide gp and beach buggy blitz games. Totally I can't satisfied this mobile.........
A good phone for everyday use. Came in a good packing. It's been 5 months since I bought it, and there are small occasional signal drops while using this phone. Maybe taking it to a Sony center might fix this issue.
ok so this was very satisfing. the phone was deliverd in 3 days that was amezing, this was very profitable deal i got a cover (i paid 225), and a free rs.1490 head phone eid it (: that was fabulous and i had to pay just 7524 waaow. talking abour the performance it has 1500mah battry which is quite impressive. just 3.5inches screen was disapponting sony should must provied atleast 3.8 inch screen. bulit was good and stong panel. i would strongly recomand everyone for this.
Writing review after 10 months usage. This phone becomes very slow and its taking time to unlock the screen. It has lot of lag become extremely slow. Cam is also not good. I would suggest to think about the phone before purchase and take decision
Pl dont go for this mobile. This is the worst mobile which i have ever used till time... Slow speed, no clarity in display, worst font style etc.,etc.,etc.,
not the best phone...........works very slow ........gamming is not good it stucks a lot while playing temple run2, subway sufr etc., lumia 525 or lumia 520 is better than this phone
I thought it should work fine with 512 RAM and internal memory of 2 GB but, there are problems with this RAM. Even if im not using fon, the free ram is only 70 to 80 mb and phone hangs. The major issue is battery dying fast and hangs too much after idle state.
I BOUGHT THE EXPERIA E FROM FLIPKART. IT IS VERY GOOD ONLINE SHOPPING PORTAL. I RECOMMEND YOU TO BUY ITEMS FROM THIS SITE.
I gifted this phone to my father, so didnt got anything to try on it, but the phone is very nice. I also use Sony phone so i know how durable and good quality sony products are . Its battery life is good ,camera is average, so is the music . Overall at the end a good buy under 10k.
Hey Guys, I am writing this review after owning this mobile for more than 6 months. So here are the PROS and CONS of this mobile. Pros - 1. Looks are awesome. Sleek design. 2. 3G 3. Got free headphone worth 1500/- Cons - 1. Because of single core processor this mobile lags and hangs a lot. -_- 2. Gaming sucks. You can't play Subway Surfer without lag, so forget about high end games. Go for this mobile if you want to show off the looks and don't care about performance.
Had gifted the Mobile to Friend, on his B'Day. Best Price Range Mobile by Sony with almost all the features
used it over 5 months in rough and tough conditions....still serving me the best way...but one day all of a sudden, while connecting any headphone( i used 4 different brands) it displayed accessory not supported and also sometimes it had issues of ghost touch when charged using laptop or desktop....so i submitted the device(and the battery) to sony service center...good people but not very awesome looking office(samsung service centers are awesome)...they told me that they will replace the whole motherboard...and told that they will return it within 7-10 days..Also they told me that motherboard comes from kolkata if stock is available, otherwise from singapore(couriers eat time)...so on the 8th day, on receiving their call i went to take the phone back...got back the device but the battery was of a different xperia e...so i asked them for my own battery..they told it might have been exchanged...and they immediately offered me a new one..so i agreed and they gave me a new sealed battery pack( i can't imagine how is that possible, a new battery costs almost 800 rupees)...checked the phone thoroughly...with the new motherboard it became snappy again as a new device.....Now the most interesting this is the service quality...i have visited samsung service center exactly 4 times(3 times with an android device in hand) and my city has 2 samsung service centers....whenever i visit the place, i am told to take a token number....once i got 43 the highest...means 43 people are ahead of me in the queue...and more incoming behind me....the AC was unable to cool and dehumidify the place with such population....but in sony service center i waited for nearly 2 hours coz they were still loading the firmware...etc and i saw only 4 complains coming(actually 3)...1 xperia E(automatic restart),2 xperia C and the 4th one was an idiot who came to ask why internet was not running on his xperia L(they fixed in 2 minutes)...considering the fact that samsung has far more sales than sony, still the amount of issues were far more in samsung devices(some would also be idiotic questions)....moreover there was not a single scratch or pressure mark on the screen,bezels and the body as if it was not opened at all....i might be the lucky guy for sony and others in some other cities might have opposite cases...still i enjoyed sony service coz they solved every issue i had...now i have no more headset problems and no more ghost touches...PEACE
this phone cost me 7K,which is quite less for a sony handset. i got a sony headphone worth 1200 bucks free with it. the ram in the phone is 512mb which is not much. when i installed a few heavy apps ,the phone used to hang. so i uninstalled many useless apps in order to save memory. the sound of the phone is really good. one big problem is that you can't install apps on external sd card. maybe rooting the phone will solve that.
Still confusing..is this designed for ladies or Gents. Both it wont suit.for ladies it will be big, for gents it is very small :P sound voice is very low. Its a culprit in sony brand. They are famous for music but songs are playing with less clarity. other wise device performance is good.
One of the best from sony, very tendy and beautiful. The quality of the product is good.. The OS is an updated one from Andoroid.. Will recommend to use the same..
A must buy product as a smartphone but its not for gaming purpose. If you want for photos and routine work its the best and being a sony product no worry...
Not a good phone at this price. one should go for xolo instesd of sony. you will get far better features. this phone freeze usually. lag in games is normal. overall it is below average.
Positives: good music, looks are 100 times better than samsung, sony ui is also refreshing and nice.... Now the downers Display is poor Battery is strictly average Such a simple thing like putting birthdays and anniversaries IS MISSING can you imagine an android so called open platform closed for such common things samsung touchwiz has it. Camera is very poor Forget gaming. Candy crush works ok. Lags a lot. Heats a lot. Sometimes i feel its good to have this phone in cold regions good insulation for cold hands :D GO FOR LUMIA 520 its the best below 8000 although there are not many games and apps but important ones are available.
The phone comes with 4.1 nd the software is with full of bugs phone lags a lot dies when runs even for small games like temple run too.........................software if sony releases a bug free software it would be helpfull
Lot of issues with the phone, 512MB is not handling Jellybean wisely... can be used for its normal use and not for its application use.
My experience with this phone is very bad,please don't buy this phone it is total waste of money go for Nokia 520....plz guys dont be so panic to android 4.1 it just hangs alot....
its a good phone but has alot of lags i have been using it since a month now and its laggy. u cant keep too manyapps runing its hanging frequently dont know what to do any help
if you considere a prise its a good product but if you willing to take this phone I recomment instead of purchasing this just add some more money into your budget & buy some other phone of Sony xperia series. Look wise phone is low. music is good.
it's a great buy from Sony I've been using this phone almost a year and nothing regrets yet. cheers for Flipkart and ws retail proud to be owner of this phone and regular customer of Flipkart and ws retail is the......... best........ want to buy another cell phone frm ws retail. regards Pankaj.
Middle level features in a good price range. can't do a lot in it bu t u shudnt expect that in a 7k phone.
This phone looks very good and very good for normal use Memory is not what is given the notes. it is said 8gb but only 2gb was given
Sony Xperia E is one of the nice device in affordable price. First of all, the Brand. You can choose any gadget under this brand.
This phone is the perfect budget smartphone. Speed is good graphics are good. All in all the phone is a great buy for Rs. 7500.
I searched for phones around 7k. This is the best one to buy. Its worthy for the price.but dont expect too much from this phone.But really a good phone at this price.
I bought this product as specs were good, there was a sony headphone and sleek design. but after months, i've just one word for this phone. 'AWFUL', it hangs like hell, music player is shitty and battery life is definitely not what the specs say. my experience with this phone is like an extremely bad dream. Please make sure you are making an informed decision.
I got a good deal on Flip kart for this phone. Got it for around 7k while it was for more than 8.5k in market in November last year along with Sony Headset FREE. Overall initial experience was good. Battery is average lasting a Day. It does lags sometimes while gaming. Camera is not so great, specialy during night but ok during day. The most amazing part of this phone is its look and feel and the light on the lower side is what made me Love this phone!! A good deal for given price.
My experience with this phone is very bad,please don't buy this phone it is total waste of money go for Nokia aur Samsung
This is a good phone, but it is priced higher especially if you compare it with Lumia 520. Nokia Lumia 520 has better hardware and is lot easier to use. As a user I am not too concerned about Android / Windows 8... I want it to be easier to use with good performance and Lumia 520 is a better phone in that sense. Coming to the price, both (lumia 520 and this) are almost same during "offer times". Since Lumia is better in terms of hardware and ease of use, I would expect Sony to lower this phone's price -- Nokia has shown what is possible in terms of price. In an absolute sense, this is also a good phone.
as usual flipkart delivery was perfect. i got it for 6650 and at that price it beat any other phones..i has thought about oher brands like xolo..but having sony is totally a diefferent experience.and the look is the best in the market. LOVE iT....best phone would be lumia 520 but its a bit more expensive and the main setback is its windows
1) best android phone in its class (Rs.7400) 2) Sony brand. 3) free gift worth 1400- Sony headset (very good sound effect) 4) don't go for any windows or other Korean mobiles for this price. 5) windows phone must be bought at Rs. 15000 and above or else they are utter waste- so Sony xperia e is best. 6) Swift delivery from flipkart. 7) camera quality not tat much expected, but its enough for this price 8) good brand android mobile for beginners.
i used this product and it is very good. i will love to buy other products from flipkart in future. and the one more thing the service they give is good
everything is good with flipkart. But coming to experia e. worst mobile i ve ever seen. clearance is not good, hangs, ll take ages to open apps, i ll not recommend this mobile to anyone.
Its Not That Good Mobile... Always Hanging.. Daily Two Or Three Times I Have To Restart My Mobile.. Battery Also Gives Problem..
PROBLEMS WITH THIS PHONE: 1. POOR RESOLUTION 2. POOR CAMERA QUALITY 3. HANGS DURING INCOMING CALLS 4. WALKMAN PLAYER STRUCK WHILE PLAYING APPS IN BACKGROUND
This is one of the good android phones under 8K. There is no lag between switching applications and using multiple applications. Only Drawback is the camera doesnot have flash, hence the pictures get dark.
In the given price range, this one is a good enough buy. The screen size being 3.5" is an advantage. It has a nice curvy shape, and comes in nice colours. The overall look and feel is very nice. Performance wise its ok. The touch is responsive. Light games and apps works well. Camera is good under bright light or daylight. Otherwise its almost useless. I would recommend it for moderate users. The handy size and the looks makes it an impressive gadget to have.
bought dis phne frm flipkart...no need to mention dt flipkart is very good at delivering the product.. and cming to the phone..everything is excellent about the phone..except 1 thng, dt you cannot zoom while you taking the video...and its a huge disappoint for me..
Good mobile. I am still exploring on how to enable data. Rest everything looks attractive with the given price.
I am very satisfied with the product. It is value for money and I am thoroughly enjoying the product. The Best is the music especially with the given headphones. It is amazing..
a better option for girls but it must be purchased along with screen gaurd and back cover as itz back is valunerable to scratches .........................
i m using it from 4 months it is overall gud phone in this price range. sometimes phone is slow and camera is not good in low light. screen resolution is average but you can not expect more in this price range. so if you r looking for budget phone with sony logo then go for it.
its an amazing phone from sony again. as expected flipkart delivered it to me very quickly. about the phone, the only con which i am facing is that having a snapdrogon processor, it lags at times. rest the camera is good, amazing walkman integrated app, screen size is ok for a budget phone like this.
Nice product, having great value price. A brand like soni itself having value of product,,, so everyone who needs Branded nice phone but with cheap cost ... should go for it. Cheaper than market price. Great!
I bought this phone allured by the head phones in the pack, for free. but the phone is severely under performs, within days of using the phone. it hangs up like anything. it never responds when you have to make important calls and multi tasking is a far away thing. I have to remove the battery almost four times a day,just to make it useable after it hangs very badly. I even did factory reset four times in a month but of no use the phone will hang again. its not that the problem is with my phone only, but the hanging problem is the inherent property of the phone itself lenovo is a better option. SONY DISAPPOINTS
I bought it for my wife.It is good, but could have been better. Compared to Nokia Lumia 520, which costs almost the same, but comes with a 5 mp camera.
Lets start with a good note: Three cheers to Flipkart! Sony Xperia E (Single sim) variant would be the right pick for the people who do not require their phones to supersede or replace their desktops or laptops. Being said the phone does its job quite seemlessly and do not leave place for you to grumble. List of things that are essentially never clear enough to most: 1. Display - It's believed that the less you pay, the lesser you get. Doesn't quite change here for the display is just not bad. But that again depends on how you respond to a little non-retina-type of screen. 2. Inside(s) - We can chuck the technical approach here and lets just stick with layman's language. Please note that this device is not designed to run multiple applications - not even with the slightest intend. That being said a couple of apps in the background would definitely not bring contempt. 3. Games: Seriously? Okay i haven't tried it honestly. 4. Design: Well it's again a conceptual discussion which depends on each person as to pin point when it's up for what's right for whom. If you do not freak out with a plasticky yet futuristic finish and if you think a little squeak and tweak occasionally would not bring the curse of Satan upon you, you're good to go and you're likely to like it! 5. UI - Sony has indeed worked upon the interface to which they've named as "Timescape" lovingly or er.. knowingly. It works like a charm during the best times and quite the opposite when times are too demanding. Overall I'm not disappointed. 6. Camera - I'd be keeping it laconically meaningful. You wanna take snaps and share it among friends? Yes? No problem here. But if you're in search to make a living out of pictures you take, you'd know where to look at! 7. Reception and Call quality - The device does stumble quite surprisingly to catch up signals anomalously. Have experienced call drops. (Not like personally I don't bless this phenomenon!) But you better watch out serious talkers. 8. Battery - Ah ! I remember my perspicacity when I had to peep at every possible corner of the review world to convince myself with the phone's ability to sustain the juice. Now that i have it tried and tested, I'd say its not egregious. After all do you easily find a man who is satisfied? 9. Other things - It's not a dedicated paraphrase in subject to the above, but just a finisher for you to decipher the purchase. a- No front camera b- No flash c- Stock headphone is a strict no-no when its time to experience music at its best d- Back cover tends to collect smudges e- Could-be-better battery life f- Aesthetically firm and well built g- Good after-sales service (whom am i kidding!) Friends, a quick reminder: Note that the phone does its job right in the area where its supposed to be good at. Don't think a lot, don't let it rot. It's just another god damned phone! Good luck.
Got it within two days.. As usual Flipkart rocks with the packaging and delivery!! First on its looks.... Pretty cool stuff, the display was clear enough, the camera and the volume buttons on the right side are also pretty handy.... The main drawback i felt was i thought I had ordered pink (the baby colored thing), yet what I had in my hands was more of an apple red one.... So this should have been Sone Xperia Red.... Next, the working was awesome... Its been a fortnight now almost that I have been using it, There are quite few lags while playing Subway Surf due to its 512 MB RAM which is quite okay for a phone at this price, but other than that, the phone is great with its other features!!! The camera and the pic quality for its 3.2 MP cam are good too..., Videos come out with good quality also... The browser works pretty fast even on a 2G network, so no prob in hanging while browsing, Atleast!!! Recently, after almost nearly 15-20 days of usage, the only disadvantage i face is that it hangs quite often, not just while playing, which u cn reduce by reducing the number of apps workng... I'm editing this review after few more (nearly 10-15 days) more usage, and now the prob is it hangs very often (even when you wanna pattern unlock the phone), which irritates most of the time....) Other than that with Sony extra loudspeaker and pic clarity, everything is perfect!!!! AFTER MORE THAN A MONTH'S USAGE, it is a good phone at this price, with almost all the basics of a smartphone...
it has always been that Sony make phones for delicate use.As predicted it the same xperia E which lags and freezes if you load too much of apps.Most probably you can flash it and switch to lower version of Android and that will be the only option left afterwards Its disappointing that People purchase this handset most probably sub 9000 out in the local market will be repent over his wastage of money I found the deal at rs 6800 so i keep my lip zip close :)
thanx again flipkart for your fast delivery... phone is awesome. works fine, design is also cool, most of the heavy games like temple run, subway surf etc works slightly.. over all this is good budgut phone...
Nothing to complain about about this handset everything is so great, performance, call quality, build quality, look, notification lights,performance, battery backup, everything- I mean what else one can expect at this price. Resolution could have been better though!
Don't buy an SD card ... first of all you can't store anything.. Whatever u Download something frm the store will go to ur phone memory and U can't move anything to the SD its not the SD Card's fault its the mobile's fault....And I can use it in anything else like my samsung ace etc.... But it not working in any sony mobiles...u can move anything to the SD By the process called rooting but if it fails you will have to pay money or something Or u will have to do other stuff ... i have a xperia e and its not working.. i regret buyin this mobile only having 2 gb.. .. :( im very sad :( Why is the reason for the sony's SD card port ... they should just remove the bloody thing :( BUT EVERYTHING ELSE IS GOOD EXCEPT FOR THE MEMORY (ONLY 2 GB) :9 :( I BOUGHT IT FRM A STORE BTW
awssm phone...camera quality is good...processor is really fast.. 4.1.1 jelly bean android version...sensitive touch.. screen size is little but small..n lack of flash and front camera are drawbacks..but this is the best phone you can find in this range
Budget Oriented Jelly Bean Phone The Sony Xperia E, is a smartphone manufactured by Sony, powered by a 1 GHz single core Qualcomm Snapdragon processor. The phone has: Pros: 1. 512 MB RAM and an Adreno 200 GPU. 2. 3.5-inch TFT capacitive touch screen. 3. 1GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon processor. 4. Adreno 200 GPU. 5. 512MB RAM (Though Limited but OK for me). 6. 4GB internal storage (expandable upto 32GB). 7. 3.2 MP Camera with 4x Digital Zoom. 8. Android 4.1 (Jelly Bean). 9. 1530 mAh battery. Cons: 1. Resolution is bit low. 2. No front camera 3. No flash Gaming: It can play games like temple run, subway surfer etc. without any lag. Conclusion: A descent phone and a great price tag offered by Flipkart.
. Have you used this product? It's always better to review a product you have used. 2. Educate other users Provide a relevant, unbiased overview of the product. Readers are interested in the pros and cons of the product. 3. Be yourself. Be informative. Let your personality shine through. But its equally important to provide facts to backup your opinions.
The display is not able to manage the very gentle TAP & SWIPE. Its giving the ***WAVE*** while very normal use !! Checked with the Official Sony Service Center (Bangalore-Indira Nagar), the service persion said that, "This by default, we cant do anything" Waste of 7.6K :(
I BUY THIS PHONE ITS TOO GOOD TO MY Let your personality shine through, but it's equally important to provide facts to back up your opinion.\
Sony mobile r pure chinese mobile.they have sound problem in handsfree while calling to some one.you heard echo of ur own sound. plz try before purchasing.
Its a good phone.As far as design is concern the phone is sleek.Since its a Sony phone the sound quality & camera quality is good enough.The only demerit I found is that due to low memory it hangs sometime and give late response if more applications are in running state.More over the internet/data traffic gets automatically disconnected if the phone is left idle for some time.
Not worth for the Money. Too worst, please don't go for this product. Not worth for the product. Resolution is toooooo Worst, and the material used looks like Kids Toy. Worst Quality used from Sony for this product. Please guys don't go for this product. To insert my SIM card in this newly purchased product I had a very bad experience. For Sure U will cry for the money you spent on this not-worthy product for the money u spend.
For this price tag the best phone available in market on android base with amazing battery backup, nice interface, nicely designed, scratch resistant screen, awesome sound quality plus Sony Headset (MDR-ZX100A) is an adorable and countable bonus with this set, 3.2 MP camera still decent , a flash and good pixel density of display are the only two things missing in the handset but hardly a concern when its under 7500, and when its Sony what else can u demand for...... a product worth buying.......
This phone is really a good phone.. I think a budget phone by SONY in this Range PROs - 1. It has got ANDROID JellyBean OS in it which is one of the latest platforms in this range 2. It has a good Sound Quality with integreated WALKMAN 3. The Look of course is a too good as BIG PHONES are not suiting for teenagers..it comes neither under big phones nor small ones. 4. The Phone is solid as me personally has mistakenly thrown it 4-5 times but observed no change in body and performance 5. The Brand of course ''SONY'' proves its capability of launching all segment phone by launching this one .... 6. It has a good battery backup lasting sometimes upto 3 days without charging CONS - 1.Camera 3.2MP is clear but sony could have given 5mp atleast 2.Many Games hang on this phone...therefore this is not at all suited for gaming. 3.Phone occasionally hangs.. 4.Resolution of the screen is less i.e.320x240 ...not acceptable from SONY... AFTER ALL THESE...The phone is descent good budget and can be called a chatting phone too .... BEST PHONE IN THIS SEGMENT...
What the hell is that..why there is so much fluctuation in price in such a short span of time. I ordered this at 6989. Now price it is showing 6712. Flipkart golden days are going to get an end .
I ordered in Flipkart and got for good price 7400 with Sony Head phones free worth of 1400. However coming to performance Little bit disappointed but the sound clarity is Awesome and Display resolution is not up to the mark but Mobile design and look wise quite satisfied. I recommend this mobile if your are looking for Design and Music clarity wise Hope this review will help LOL :)
Simply superb, best deal from flipkart, no other online store gives in this price band. Very rugged, tough mobile. Worked smoothly even after water contact, Much better build quality than nokia 520. Single core is enough to look after you daily needs and battery stamina lasts longer. Simply go for it.
A good Shot from Sony. It's a good phone at this price compared to all other phones(including non branded phones) available in the market at present. with sony, you will get quality guaranteed. very good sound quality with the integrated walkman app, and with sony music, i can download original songs... But the thing which disappointed me is the processor. it has a single core processor which is not built for heavy apps, and even sometimes "whatsapp" not runs well on it. not made for real multitasking.... but with 8000/- in hand, a good choice
Very good phone at this price but not good as compared to nokia lumia 520 lumia 520 is at same price and better than this
Along with the affordable price tag, you have decent-ish hardware, such as a 1 Ghz processor, 3.2 Megapixel camera and 3.5 inch display as well as access to all the apps and games available on Google’s Play Store. Sony Xperia E looks interesting enough, I guess. Made out of mostly plastic, it probably wont be the best design you’ve seen on a smartphone, but for an affordable phone, it looks decent enough. The back is slightly curved inwards which helps you to keep a hold on the phone, with the textured surface allowing for a better grip. Measuring 113.5 x 61.8 x 11 mm and weighing 115.7 grams, it’s comfortable enough to use one handed. One very cool thing about the Xperia E, is the fact that Sony has embedded a notification light at the bottom, which is RGB type so that it glows in different colours depending on the notification.
Tad slow, especially picking contacts, retrieving messages etc. Net works well. Great clarity . Cam not too great. But value for money. Great looks. Good features
This is the 3rd 5 star i m giving to a product bought from flipkart out of 4... Its an awesome phone and it costed me only Rs 6999 to buy it as there was an offer for diwali... wow!!! its an amazing phone... the only irritating thing was their delivery.. It came 5 days late.. But still it does not affect the quality of the product... I got an amazing phone for the price i paid... Thanks flipkart!!! :-)
I bought this product 2 months ago from flipkart only and believe me they delivered it within 24 hours. I haven't faced any problem with this product till now, everything is perfect. battery backup one day after continuously playing games and its sound quality is also perfect. it sound good with earphone. at this price i.e. inr 68,00 i suggest this is the best mobile.
the product is good but asking to write a review for 100 characters is certainly not makes that much of sense at all. hope you know i m just filling up more words to add up till 100 chars. the phone was excellent .
Good phone with all features needed for a smartphone. Surprisingly reasonable. Assurance of Sony goes without saying and this product too delivers what it promises. The Android os is user friendly and you get all the benefits of the Google apps. All in all, a good buy at a good cost for a good looking phone. The only negative point I can point out is that I'm not too happy with the battery life - you need to charge it almost every 24 hours. Other that that, highly recommended.
Slow in performance compared to other mobiles problem with voice response for touch notifications in all sony mobiles no near by service centres only 3 in chennai
this phone is a waste of money and a big let down going by the sony name i got it but its not a a nice phone although it has a lot of features but they hardly work it has a really small screen it gets hang and does not open camera does not have flash and it does not even have a front camera cannot store many pictures and cannlot download games in it very easily a nd while playing games it gets stuck
It's not great as i expected. It's a very average and normal working phone. It even lags sometimes. The main drawback is it lacks flash.
Quick delivery....thts the most impressive thing about flipkart....about product i would say its very good phone for basic users at this price...
got a great discount on this device from sony. i bought it for only 6999 free sony headset and 500rs. worth ebooks
Recently i mean to say that within a week, brought this phone, so hanging really got irritation, I advice you to not buy this..
Brilliant Fabrication Brilliant Audio Good Screen resolution Average TOuch Responsiveness No in Ear Headphones Expensive in the range
Truth be told, I had some great expectations from my first smartphone, but Sony has gone out of its way to disappoint me. The phone is TERRIBLY slow, lags a lot, comes preloaded with a bunch of crapware and drains off its battery within a day even without answering a single call/sms/watsapp. The cracking sound in loudspeaker mode is another turn off though it fares decently in headphones. Camera quality is also rather below standard, especially when coming from Sony. The only positive point is its look and feel - and nothing else rationalises this thing for being priced at over 7k. Such a waste of hard earned money! :(
after using so many phone was curious about sony experia E , looks wise dashing but work wise very dull, network will go without asking you and will never come until you restart the phone, my friend also inspired by look purchased E dual after me and he is also having same issue, 3 times gone to service centre, they do flash and return it, no techincal guidance with them why netwrok goes even in automatic search mode, no games installed then also hangs many time.may be processor has just name of Ghz. over all poor phone with very irriating Performance,
SUperb phone with this price. works well with 2g and 3g both. screen resolution is good. good deal at this price with sony quality. will definitely buy again if i need
Nice product at a budget that suits me. Fully satisfied. I would recommend it to anyone who wants to buy a budget smart phone without burning their pocket. The camera of this mobile is bit low comparing to Nokia Lumia 520. Other features are of top standard. I will definitely give 4 out of 5 to this product.
i booked the mobile on sunday evening and got it next day itself. super fast delivery and the product is amazing for the budget range
mobile is gud , but display and touch is not satisfactionable while comparing with the store selling mobile, because i get this phone by flipkart.com
Nice features for the budget..Good choice for girls! It is a little hard to move from other brands to Sony, but once you get used to it, you may like it. Fair battery life.
Great product and Great Dilevery Service. I got also a free bee with Sony Experia. Sony Head phones for having a deep enjoyment of Music. I just love the deal
I had neo v earlier, given it to my wife bought this 6 months back. From 2006 i am fan of sony all my previous phones also from sony. I am big fan of sony and it worth to belive sony for sound and camera quality. But this time i got cheated. I had J105 sony erricson mobile with 2MP camera, it was taking good photos even in low light than this phone which carry 3mp. Sound quality is worst. Browsing also disappointing. Not at all worth.... This is one of the worst mobile for this price from SONY Only good thing in this mobile is the head phone. Sony please remove this model from market..
after using this phone for 4 months i observed that some faults of phone 1)Games noting start easily 2)phone hve no flash light 3)phone low megapixel camera 4)Have low RAM ..... but if you want purchase the phone of sony this phone will satisfied you
Good phone with looks..but is slow if too much apps use...of course...the phone has its own limitations..if you are planning to buy a nice look phone with basic android use..go ahead...else...need to take a look for more options.
Very Good handset. It comes with lots of preloaded apps. Picture Clarity is superb & sounds are also good. Flipkart delivered on next day !
I have purchase sony mobile from flipkart delivery is good also phone feature is good but litle bit slowness when i open contact & dail history. other wise nice phone sound quality is also good.
This is the best smart phone with the features like languages, battery backup, Musical quality, weightless and attractive smart phone for its cost.
The product is pretty Good.Good sound quality and good user interface.Head phone is not so good and the Display is bad.But nice android phone for this price
Have been using for about 2 months now. Good call quality. One issue is that Xperia E gets disconnected from wifi and I have to turn phone's wifi off and again turn on after few seconds. As both my laptops and Nokia 701 stay connect without this issue, it must be problem with Xperia E. Proximity sensor is also a bit unpredictable but still a good phone overall.
Ok as is obvious from the header, I am totally disgusted with this phone. Within a week of purchase I realised that I had simply flung my cash down the drain. Software glitches and sudden call drops have become the order of the day, ever since. Taking the phone to the center has been no consolation either. If you wanted to play games like "Temple Run" or "'Subway Surfers" you'd have to have a hell lot of patience to sit through frequent pauses during your chase. I'm totally disappointed in Sony for making such a phone and even putting it on the market. I would give this phone the lowest score which is "0" but since the score-meter does not accept a score lower than "1", I have to unwillingly give it a score of 1.
Its around 3 weeks i am using the sony xperia e .. i am a bit disappointed with the walkman application bring by sony .. whenever i play any song, after a few sec when mobile sleeps ,sound shatter for a while and this continues (so i downloaded MX Player).. i am still facing this problem . . otherwise this mobile is great at its price..
This is my first ever touch and android phone. So I examined it thoroughly. First of all let me clear that the phone is not for gamers or heavy users. Using it randomly I notice both cons and pros of the phone. Cons first - Display/ resolution are not that great, impossible to read on direct sunlight. - Volume, Power key are too small to operate (May damage for heavy use) - Quick camera key is not prompt to respond - Camera is average at daytime, bad at night. I wonder if it is AF or not.(However almost all 3-5 mp cams are same under 9k) - Back panel and battery are too hard to remove(Again May damage for heavy use) - Video recording quality is overall average(better than other VGA recorders or 720 p of Indian brands under 9k) - FM is not as simple as others but loud. - Screen guard or cover is not provided. - Sony provides white headset with all colour models...so ridiculous. - Only usb cable serves as both data cable and charger, random use may damage usb port. - Price little high in local market. I bought mine for 8900. Now pros are- + Very very good battery backup. Normal usage like net, music, videos etc. battery stays almost 2 days. (Without any power saver app) + Touch is super duper fine, quick response always + Charger and headset are of good quality. + Built quality is strong and gripped well in hands, all sensors works fine. + Music player is awesum. With Xloud and walkman app sound is great, too loud and never distort even in full volume. You will get a free stereo headset with this phone. + Very good and user friendly interface. Some say that Sony is too complex but it is not so. JB works really fine + All video formats even HD mkv. Plays superb. Video Playback is really good in its screen. + Net is superfast, big pages open quickly even on 2G. Bluetooth transfer is quick and hassle free. + All small or medium games (below 30 mb) work flawless. Did not try too much. + AGPS works superb ,even in remote areas. + Finally, there is no lagging, hanging or heating problem (1 & 11 are common problem in low range androids) Whether U buy it or not is ur Decision.. but it is almost a VFM phone.
I got this phone from Flipkart a week back and I'm really happy with both the pricing and the product. Flipkart has extremely competitive prices and very prompt delivery which I would recommend to everyone irrespective of what they're buying. The phone itself is a work of art for the price at which it's being sold. Definitely the best phone in this price range. Pros: Sony Xperia Brand(!), Android Jellybean, Good performance (has a Qualcomm chipset), 3G, WiFi, good UI and touch, Walkman makes for a great listening experience, no bugs so far. Cons: Display (avg resolution), not so great a cam, lower RAM so definitely not a gaming phone. But the low price more than outweighs the cons so I would vehemently recommend the phone.
Good Product at a cheap price Nice in built apps (Some are useless, please uninstall them as it eats up up your internal memory) Good battery back up Good picture clarity and stylish look Fits into your pocket as screen not too big Only problem no front camera
sony timescape UI is very heavy for the phone!! The phone hangs during incoming call.Sometimes the "Reject call with msg" automatically sends msg and cancel the call..
I have purchased it 1 month ago. It's working well and it's awesome at this range. My roommate bought some local brand DUAL CORE phone and xperia E is working faster than that one. Music in SONY phones is great. Its having baas boost and XLOUD. And also I rooted this phone for customized use. After root access it's working amazingly fast. But I suggest you to not root if you are not an advanced user. One more thing- Sony has launched FIREFOX OS for testing purpose for xperia E only. I am going to install firefox OS in my phone. Buy it. I am sure you will not be disappointed.
I bought this in just Rs. 6999/- and guess what I got a headphone worth Rs. 1491 Free. What can you expect at this price. The packaging was good with bubble cover inside, and delivery was good too, got the product in just 3 days.
So I bought it outside of Flipkart (too excited to wait), and the phone itself is awesome. Qualcomm Snapdragon, Adreno 200, okayish screen, all good. The phone stopped working (which turned out to be my fault), and the guys at Sony fixed it in less than ten minutes. The phone doesn't lag, long as you use another launcher (like Apex or Nova, can be found on the Play Store) and don't use too many widgets. Gaming is good, but don't expect Asphalt 8 or GTA: San Andreas. That said, some pretty heavy games like GTA: Vice City and CSR Racing work pretty nicely. However, if you can, you should get a Lumia 520. That thing is just *better*. Half the people who bought this phone, say that they've made a mistake. If you're a geeky person like me, one who likes his ROMs, another reason not to get this; CyanogenMod is the only Jelly Bean-based ROM, and even that has a few things not working (and is still stuck on 4.1.2). All in all, good phone, but don't buy it.
Wanted to buy an entry level Android for an upgrade from an old Symbian phone and this seemed to be best option. Has earlier version of Jelly Bean out of the box. RAM utilization is normal, but good Android tweaks can improvise this. Build quality is much better than Samsung or cheapy Indo-Chinese makes. Battery is good enough for basic WhatsApp and Calls. Display could have been slight better but I think is ok if you know what you want to use this for. Price was best for offered by Flipkart than other seller online or offline. Came with promised free goodies by Flipkart on time. LOL!!! Got this yesterday and today I write the review and notice the Price has gone up - Rs. 7999/-!!!
Pros: 1. great looks 2. dedicated button for cam. So selecting camera is easy just hold the button for some time and press to click the photo. 3. notification LED and lock LED at the bottom looks cool. 4. great pricing by flipkart 5. free huge headphone by sony. the headphone is average too but its a good offer and I fell for it. Cons: 1. Very slow at times, usually after unlocking. sometimes it gets so slow that when call comes the ringtone also lags in between. 2. the display is poor, but you cant expect more in this price range. flipkart is offering very competitive offer. 3. removing back panel takes the unlock button with it, so i m afraid someday the button will come off the back panel. so have to be very careful. 4. no profile change options in drop down. so changing profile from outdoor to meeting or silent is a little complex. also settings like auto-rotations and all can not be changed through the drop down, u have to go to the settings for that.
Great Mobile, and great headset. One of the most elegant design the only thing is real internal memory for user use is 2gb and not 4gb.
the phone is very good expect for the RAM. but is good compared with nokia lumia 520 for its user interaction.but it hangs frequently and battery capacitance is quite low,
sound and speed its good...it lacks on display resolution ..would recommend to go for micromax or karbonn mobiles ... but if u want crystal clear music quality ..there is no match for Sony ...
ITS MY 2ND ORDER 2 FLIFKART...1ST I HAD PUCHED A htc DERIRE C....THT WAS TERRIBLE EXPERIENCE I HV EVER FACED...LET IT B... NOW COME 2 XPERIA E... BATERY BACK UP IS SO SO... CAMERA CLARITY IS NT WELL.. SOMETYMS SENSER IS NT WORKNG PROPERLY...BT NET SPEED IS GR8 IN 2G..BT GAMEING SPPED ALSO SLOW WHN I PLAY TEMPLE RUN 2
Good Range of Smartphone from Sony. Good Battery backup Jellybean 4.1.1 (Update Available ) 3.1 MP camera from Sony is better, good picture clarity in out doors also from indoors also, but need lighting. Overall it's a good one from Sony with this price.
cell is good but not have many simple options which basic cell have n while connecting to system or tablet its headache better who wants easy working dont buy it but camera is good but voice quality is bad i checked it after the recording
Quick delivery by Flipkart. Thanks to seller- Ws retail. I got the phone with perfect seal packed condition. Only the Cons are: 1- Camera quality not so good, its having no flash. 2- No front/Secondary Camera. 3- Low RAM. Overall its a good phone within this range. I will give 3 out of 5.
nice choice one would say. One of the affordable mobile for all. But The offer am looking for is not here as expected by me. Panasonic is giving good pack of discounts.
I have tried every other way of resolving the issue and am writing to you with great hope. I Bought a sony xperia LT28H Sony Xperia ION on 16th of October 2012, The phone would keep restarting automatically and its software got restored multiple times at sony service center. Last time they also replaced the PCB after keeping the set with﻿ them for 20 days moreover the set is back with sony again, fourth time now. Current ticket ID : 13101703168. They have promised me a call back at least 12 times and never has anyone called me back or resolved the issue, guys wins it sony's official blog or Facebook or Twitter before you buy to see number of frustrated customers.
First of all.. THANKS to FLIPKART for the price and delivery.. You guy's rock.. I got it from FK for Rs. 7409 with one SONY over ear headphone free worth Rs.1400(approx) Super-like... Good utility phone.. Worth the price. With this price range and features I will rate it 4 stars Camera: OK Sound quality : With Regular Headphone(3.5/5 expected a bit more with Sony) With the over head Head Phone( Awesome!! 5/5. But a mike would have done wonders.) Processing speed: OK, Lags a bit sometimes though (4/5 look at the price) Punchline: IF YOU WANT TO HAVE AN ANDRIOD SMARTPHONE THAT WORKS AND WITH AN AFFORDABLE PRICE RANGE, U WILL NOT REGRET BUYING THIS PHONE.
Really awesome phone... Bought it for my parents.. Awesome service as usual by flipkart... Well packed and best price... Thanks :)
Using this phone for 5 months. Used to be very laggy and would freeze anytime. But after the recent update it has become smoother,now it hardly lags. Battery performance also improved
I brought this phone recently. I am using it and for basic smart features its working fine but totally incompatible for gaming. If we intend to buy then we should make sure that very less no of games are available for this phone. Although you can download most of the games but it lags a lot due to its outdated 1 ghz processor. But still a good buy due to the brand. And I always prefer brands (i.e purely personal view)
Why the phone sometime get slow. It should not be expected from Sony while having 1Ghz processor. Overall it's a good phone. The only problem is slowness.
This is a basic andriod phone with all general features as is sufficient for those who don't use it much..
This phone hangs all the time ! The major cons are it's poor Display and pathetic camera. Not good in any area. Rating 1/5
Bought it and got it exchanged within 1 month because of multiple defects ( Touch screen did not function properly..., phone lagged a lot, my SMARTPHONE could not even detect the SIM-card). Bad luck followed again... The touch screen again stopped working... Then it came back to life on its own... Though the response was seriously erratic. Even after my multiple visits to the service center, paying huge amounts to them as the warranty had gone void due to supposedly liquid ingression, though it actually never occurred, I'm left with a so called smartphone with more defects, ( all due to poor servicing--The proximity sensor no more works, the touch behavior is still very erratic, the screen is swollen from the top and no more fits properly into the phone, and there is a strand of hair into the screen which I don't know how to remove!!!) after trying my perseverance for the last three months, and I still don't know what to do with it. Even re-selling a phone with touch not working properly is hard. It's just like a good looking DUMB bride! All in all, as I've already said, spending your hard earned money on such a phone is utter foolishness, do not even think about purchasing this piece of shit!! I would never buy an Xperia phone again. I never did expect this from Sony.
I have been using the phone for last one month. Pros: Voice quality is excellent. Battery backup time is ok. Able to use the phone for more than a day with voice calls and internet usage. Pinch-to-Zoom sensitivity is good. Cons: Intermittent lag when receiving the calls, dial pad. Overall a good basic android phone.
I have received Defective product and logged Complaint and got replaced but still the Product was defective, as i have received Nice Packing and box was sealed. there was hissing noise from mobile. same product with my friend his product is good and there is not hissing noise. cons: Sony Xperia hangs a lot, and when i receive a call it waits for 8 to 10 sec and den it displays the name until that full black screen. I am really happy that Flipkart has Refunded my amount because of this defective product. Shopping in Flipkart really awesome, if any defective they replace or refund. Thanks again to flipkart. Now i have Purchased Sony Xperia ZR last week, i will see it for few days and will post review on that product. NO Flash and nothing, device hangs a lot. Regards, Vinayak
For people buying an android phone...android needs atleast 1GB RAM as it is more resource heavy. So buy android phones with atleast 1GB of RAM. This phone also has a 3.5 inch screen......bad for watching videos and for eyes. But if you are a only light user who needs a touch screen phone for light-tasks like calls and twitter/FB this phone is okay. But always try out the device before you buy...applies to any phone.
I would say that dont buy this product ..... anymore this is just waste of money but because of flipkart i saved my money ,,,,,
It is highly not recommended to buy Sony mobile phone, Sony has worst service support. i have purchased Sony experia E from flipkart and the delivery from flipkar was superb but the product quality from sony is third grade. After receiving mobile it start giving problem with in first 10 days. initially mobile gets hanged on frequent basis that why I visit Sony authorized service center. But even after 20 days they are not able to rectify my issue and saying that part is not available.. i am frustrated after several follow-up with Sony authorities. useless customer care as well. worst ever product i have seen so it’s not recommended to buy this product. Buy this product with your own risk.
it was very slow on perfomance.And the headset was good one it has great sound.I enjoy it very well............
Good Product M happy but having some lag someting,after update to latest android software version! excellent delivery,gt the product before expected delivery date.
I have got this phone and replaced it twice. I couldn't be able to attend the calls when the phone is ringing. I have to wait for a couple of minutes to search a contact. Disappointed to the core. Sony has failed in its camera and music quality. You cannot even use the basic applications. It lagged like anything and the specifications are very poor and they did not perform as they have mentioned. Earlier, I had used a couple of Sony mobiles and I don't know how did this happen and I am wondering why Sony is manufacturing such a worst performance mobile!!! I suggest Nokia Lumia 520 for this budget and you will be happy. Don't get this and spoil your money, time and happiness.
Gifted my dad and he has ever since been on it whenever he is free. Good phone but sometimes the performace is sluggish. Also the connectivity to wifi networks (pre-configured) does not always get through in one try. Guess that is the case with most sony phones. Decent value for money
Awesome I like it .I hope i cud clarify all ur queries, I knwo android lovers will dislike my post, and hate me.. But Experia at price of 8000-8500 would have been a good buy. Because u can get Lumia 520 at Rs. 10,500. And then flipkart will reduce it. :)
This products have awesome appearance, it is handy, has almost every features that the phones of this much range should have. But the main work of a mobile phone is to make phone calls , and for that you'll need some network...... this is where this phone becomes useless, too hard to get reception, even in regular places... At the beginning I thought that it might be a minor network problem, but other phones like Samsumg, Nokia, even Micromax & karbonn were running nicely.. but my phone remained the same.... please go for other brands if your main purpose is to make phone calls... But if you want this, go to your nearest retailer and buy after ensuring its authenticity..
This phone is quite good for music but if you want to play HD games likes NFS Shift, Raging Thunder etc. etc. then don't go for it. This phone doesn't play any HD videos, I installed MX player It plays the HD videos but there are some problems arising in buffering. After I purchase this phone I use PC Companion for update the latest frameware of this phone. After updating the frameware this phone became smooth and battery backup time increase. And make the GPU better. Price of this phone is comparatively low rather than other shopping sites and market also. And the best thing is I get a SONY HEADPHONE of worth Rs. 1449 completely FREE
i must give 100000000000 stars for this phone but what can i do there is only 5 star......amazing phone all must have this phone .sony music is amazing .best phone for gaming !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
very good phone ui is awesome , the phone is very fast ,music is goo headphone i recieved free with this phone r awesome ,games like fifa 14 run on this phone without any lag . and of course on flipkart the price is lowest and i also recieved 1 year warrant , flipkarts service is awesome
Pros: Good looks Cons: Hangs and freezes, GPS stops working intermittently untill you do a hard restart, takes long time to boot if you have loaded with many apps. Has issues with Dual SIM, at any point of time one of the SIM Signals go dead untill phone is restarted. Please avoid this phone if you have some other choice.
first of all i wanna say superb service from flip... great mob from sony... and awesome head phone(free). my rating 5/5/ :) ;) :P Key Features 1 GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon Processor 3.2 MP Camera with 4x Digital Zoom 3.5-inch TFT 320 x 480 Pixels Display Android v4.1 (Jelly Bean) OS Integrated WALKMAN App HD Voice and Noise Suppression
DON'T GO FOR THIS PHONE EVER !!! The phone was working nice till a month but one day automatically the screen cracked when it was in my pocket. Don't know what to do now. The sony service centre is goin to charge for it surely!
This was my first phone and have been using for about 3-4 months.The design of the phone is great. It can easily fit into one's pocket. The phone comes with JB v.4.1 out of box and works smoothly and has a good touch response, is fast and has very good sound quality and the speaker is loud enough (I mean this is Sony we are talking about).The camera is average and can take good pictures only in proper light conditions. The 1500mAh battery gives a good battery backup. On an averge use, the phone can last for about 1-2 days. The GPU works fine and can play most of th casual games without any lags. The thing that caught my attention at first look was the illumination bar at the bottom that changes color according to the themes. Sony just a few days back released a firmware update 11.3.A.2.23. This update has given new life to this phone. It has improved the performance of the phone.The phone works smoothly. The GPU works a lot better. The display has alsp improved and one can see the screen even in direct sunlight which was problem before the update. The STAMINA mode has increased the battery life and now can last for 3-4 days on average use. Given that it is a budget phone, the features are sufficient enough according to it's price. The free headphones are cherry on the top.
For people who are looking for a budget android phone, this is a really good deal. The phone looks chic, the screen is wide and the interface has the signature Sony Style. The light display at the bottom of the sleek phone gives it a sophisticated feel. A complete good looker it is - this phone. The internal memory and performance is decent - though not extraordinary, the phone's functioning is good . The phone heats up and hangs as much as all other android phones when used beyond threshold. Temple run and other games run fine too :) Photos clicked from the camera are of average quality but the clicks good pics if there's ambient natural light. The thing that put me off a bit is that the touch sensitivity is not on par with the expectations. Despite the seeming flaws, my sister who is the user of this phone absolutely loves it for the other good features it has. Would recommend it to anybody who is looking for a decent buy with a decent budget.
I have personally experienced this phone, it is fully satisfied phone in the serious of 8k. The phone comes shipped with the latest Android v4.1 Jelly Bean Operating System. The use of the Jelly Bean OS allows for much smoother performance levels as well as a fluid UI operation. Camera The phone comes with a 3.2 MP primary camera which is good enough to take pictures in broad daylight. Processor The Sony Xperia E comes with a powerful 1 GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon Processor. This allows for faster application operation and better power savings. Screen and Connectivity The phone comes with a decent 3.5 inch TFT Capacitive Touchscreen. As far as connectivity is concerned, the WiFi adapter allows for a smooth and rapid internet connection with a good data transfer rate. AT END THIS IS SUPERB DEAL JUST GO FOR IT!!
Bought it and have been using it for some days now. I would recommend everyone to stay away from this phone. It is full of problems to such an extent that you will bang your head with the walls. First of all it hangs even on slight use. When it receives an incoming call, it hangs up and takes 5-10 seconds to even display the name of the caller from the phone book. Secondly it has a pathetic touch, you have to press it hard for it to respond. So forget playing any cool touch sensitive games on it. Thirdly battery backup lasts half of what is claimed by sony in this phone. I bought it because of the sony brand and am really disappointed with it.
Sony's Xperia E (C1504) is the lowest priced smartphone in the Xperia series. The design and aesthetics of the phone are good, especially with the black model. The phone is not too big, and fits neatly into hands, and all of the screen is accessible with one hand. The phone's specifications are not meagre, and is definitely powerful by its core hardware. There has not been any irritating lags or screen freezes with my average usage, but I don't use the phone for games, and have installed only a few apps. The camera is bad in low light, but that is understandable, given the other features in the package at such a low price. But the one let down that definitely could have easily been better is the display quality, that is, the resolution and colour density. Watching videos is not really something the phone was made for. There isn't a Bravia engine installed either. Sony could have been a little less thrifty in that part, because even if they had demanded a 1000 rupees more for that, no one would have really minded. The battery backup is great (with extended battery mode on), and matches that of the Nokia basic phone that I had owned previously. Anyway, the phone is a neat basic smartphone, and someone who is buying his first smartphone will be totally fine with it.
The Sony Xperia E is an Android smartphone manufactured by Sony. The Xperia E is powered by a 1 GHz single core processor (Qualcomm Snapdragon S1 MSM7227A). The phone has 512 MB RAM and an Adreno 200 GPU. This mobile phone is the successor of Sony Xperia Tipo. Pros:: 3.5-inch (480 x 320 pixels) TFT capacitive touch screen display 1GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon MSM7227A processor Adreno 200 GPU (for graphics and gaming) Timescape UI Scratch Resistant 512MB RAM 4GB internal storage, up to 32GB expandable memory with microSD 3.2-megapixel rear camera Xperia E - Android 4.1 (Jelly Bean) 3G, Bluetooth, WiFi b/g/n, DLNA, GPS / aGPS 1530 mAh battery Free Headset (for limited period of time)
it has been over a month since i got this mobile.. and i am pleased to say i am fully satisfied with this model. as you may know this mobile has jelly-bean android OS , 1 GHz processor and 512 mb ram. you just can not doubt in Sony's sound quality and its look will make you feel very good in front of other 15-20 grand mobiles. talking about the con... Sony's processor is not that much strong as that of Samsung and micro-max and 512 mb ram is not enough( i mean when u r doing multitasking it may lag sometimes. but thanks to a recent android update this lagging problem has been minimized. after the update i can say it is the best mobile not only in this range but also some mobiles of higher range.
We have recently purchased White Xperia E single sim. After we saw all the reviews at flipkart before buying, we were in a sort of confusion as lot of people said that it was really slow and screen was awful. We checked the phone briefly at a store near us before we placed an order for the same on Flipkart. Reason for ordering this phone was that, my other half liked the phone and it was for her, as it looked nice in white which it is from back to front plus the design which included a thin chrome strip around it which glows from bottom every now and then, and the shape of the phone. Our usage of the phone would be very limited to just making calls, texting, using alarm feature and using calendar and occasional web usage. Obviously the screen is not something to write about with this phone and if you want good screen at this price then this is not the phone for you. However this phone comes for 8000 + change, which is okay as per me for a smart phone starter of basic level, and it has latest android 4.1 which is very good. It also has a free set of sony headphone costing around 700 bucks which is advantage if someone wants one, as they are getting them for free and produce decent sound. Everyone has different requirements and expectations so obviously it wont fit all but to be honest, it will suit someone who is looking for a good looking phone on a budget as all galaxy phones look same with plain jane design, works good if you are not a power user, and are buying your first smartphone, also produces good music sound if you have decent pair of headphones. I am giving it four stars as I still believe that sony could have given a tad better resolution screen at this price although the other half is more than happy with the phone. She is not as geeky as some of us here about these things. Thanks Guys.
I received the phone yesterday, to my surprise the camera is not good as expected, it just cannot shoot in low light, in a CFL lit room, even a small motion of object during clicking spoils the photo,photo becomes blur. I previously had galaxy Y 5360 and its camera was pretty good even in the same light conditions. Also I was not able to transfer .flv files from my other mobile phone to Xperia E via Bluetooth because I think that they are not compatible with built in player and this thing really annoyed me. I would not recommend any body buy this for 7.9k like i did. although sound is good. but in a smartphone sound is not everything. Also there is problem connecting to WIFI network My samsung galay Y connects smoothly to my home WiFi network but Sony Xperia connection to wifi is intermittent. It connects when it wants and not when I want. You can spend hours trying to connect. rebooting you phone and router, but in vain. NEVER BUY.
A very good purchase at this price. Resolution is low but its OK at this price, other than this everything looks fine. Good purchase if you are looking for entry level smart phone. And Flipkart was excellent as always with delivery and Service.
Really amazing product i hav orderd this in flipkart for the amazing discount with walkman headset really awesome yaar.flipkart was wondering nowadys..am really double satisfied!!!PROUD OF U FLIPKART!!!
Well I bought this phone through flipkart 2 months back and phone is working quite good, all the applications are working fine, no problem in playing games and support all android games, But hte main problem is its Internet connection beacuse I wasnt able to use any of its internet supported applications neither youtube nor anything else Except Whatsapp and other messaging application, so my opinion is that you first this phone from flipkart because it is cheaper than your local mobile stores (i.e. almost 1K) and then configure your mobile phone from your service provider. Go for this gadget because it is the cheapest Best branded Android phone available currently.
This could be called the Sony's Best Smart Phone released until now at such competitive prices! The phone can handle memory on the internal and the external front clubbed with a powerful processor to run a movie file or play a game without any hassles. The battery lasts for over a day if you've internet streaming throughout The phone impresses you with an overall good experience for someone who's using a smartphone for the first time :)
It is totally waste of money Processing is too slow screen is very poor and not duerable and hangup frequently Sound problem is occured during music play.................................................................... Please don't buy.
DONT EVEN THINK ABOUT BUYING ANY OTHER SMARTPHONE . SONE XPERIA IS AWWWWWESOME!!!!!!! For other aspects I think there r enough reviews available here.... Decent apps , camera is perfect for this price range (I am not including micromax karbon etc) Jellybean the best android is available . Expandable memory also helps for a large music collection.
Excellent Mobile from Sony, Best phone for First time Android users and battery backup is awesome... Camera clarity is acceptable and its HD Audio option is an added advantage As Always Great Delivery by FlipKart.com
UNTIL YOU BUY YOU CANNOT EXPLORE THE FEATURES PACKED IN THIS HANDSET. ITS COME FROM HOUSE OF SONY - THE WORLD LEADER IN ELECTRONICS. YOU CAN GO NEXT GENERATION OF XPERIA SERIES MATCH AS PER YOUR POCKET TO GET MORE FEATURES LIKE XEPERIA-L.
Purchasing Sony xperia E was the best decision taken as compared to any normal windows phone. It has all the features of value for money. Best hindi proverb suitsbfor this ' Sasta , Sundar aur tikau' ( Cheap, Beautifully designed and Best quality). Also the service received from flipkart was amazing. Product was delivered with due care and with superb packaging.
Ain't here to Suggest any one, As each one of U having Ur Own idea.!! But One thing Sheerly I can Say that it is an "Frugal Mobile" with many Features. Positive-- 1 GHz Snapdragon Processor,HD Voice and Noise Suppression, Negative-- No Flash
good and Nothing is worse than inaccurate information. If you're not really sure, research always helps.Sony Xperia E, smartphone di fascia bassa con Android 4.1 e .Expertly created for simplicity. The no-nonsense Android smartphone. we have seen many Indian and Chinese brands offer plenty of affordable smartphone
I have bought this from flipkart, it is a budget phone with satisfying performance overall. Only disadvantage is : it is mot having flash for camera and no front cam . remaining all the things are very well , display is not that bright as sony high range phones still it is okay as compared to the price. Go for it. I have been using this phone and installed games like subway surfer , minion rush etc. no such lag observed while playing those.
i got this phone from flipkart yesterday... very fast delivery... awesome service from flipkart.com.... hats off.... thanks a lot.... this phone is very good ,,,, support all apps.... playing games smooth..... i thought that dis is great budget phone of this price... battery durable.....
I placed an order & very next day i found its cost going down by 500 . . .disappointed . got phone . . . unpacked . . . . .used for 3 days . . . disappointed. then flashed firmware ver. 2.13 ,latest & not yet released worldwide, much stable & better with this phone . . . . . Basic phone had few issues with its software ver 0.47 . Camera is also a drawbak .
I will recommend this phone, if anyone want the good looking, latest android, nice sound quality and battery backup, this phone is totally different from the Samsung..mobile is looking gorgeous and experiencing the great phone while handling.....increase the phone features and pixel clarity
it is the best phone i ever used as it has good camera. its processor gets slow while playing games but for other applications it is superup. u can use its other applications like facebook, gmail, google talk which are inbuild in it. in my advice it is the best smart phone under 10000
Thanks to Flipkart for timely delivery !! using phone since 15 days !! Build quality is nice !! if ua a muzic lover then wud suggest u to go for it !! :) listening using xloud music is too cool !! esp with the headset :) there are special effects with ths fone which normally the buget fones doesnt have !! though the processor s 1ghz it has given lag at times !! also ram cud have been atleast 786mb..screen is also decent... Overall its a decent buy even xolo are producing ossum products !! do check them along with ths !! :)
Thanks to Flipkart!! Sony Experia E is the best phone under 10K:-) Pros: Build quality at this price is just awesome, 1Ghz processor,512Mb RAM,3.2Mp Camera, listening xloud music is amazing,4Gb Internal Memory,touch is quite responsive:-) Cons: RAM would make this phone much better in terms of performance,when compared to Nokia Lumia 520 5Mp camera Sony's E falls back, low resolution,screen would be more bigger may be 4 inch:-( Overall: Best budget phone under 10k,but who are not looking for branded mobiles can go for XOLO and Micromax mobiles. But Sony is always the Best among all these mobiles. Easy buy,we can go for it!!
The phone is good for the price paid, 1GHZ proc does its job very well, good touch response, looks good,free headphone give good sound +ve 1Sound clarity 2Performance 3Display 4.Android v4.1 (Jelly Bean) OS -ve 1.Single core Processor. 2.No HD Recording. 3.No HD video playback. 4.3.2 MP Primary Camera 5.3.5-inch TFT Capacitive Touchscreen
hangs 4 to 5 times in a day this is the most disappointing and irritating problem, performance is also very poor, battery backup is ok, gets heated up when I attended any call for 4 mins ... better to choose Samsung galaxy fame or Nokia lumia 520 at this price point... and a poor response when I called Flipkart regarding my problem hope after reading this may be I will get any response.... I still believe Flipkart is the best source for online shopping...
The sceen's awesome, phenomenal design, build quality and one hand usage, and timescape does not suck as much as touchwiz does. But, the phone lags. A lot. It can play real football 2012 and minion rush kinda games, but lag kills the whole experience. Do not install a lot of apps and just root it the first chance you get.
the phone hangs alot, sound quality is also poor. I would advice you no to buy but go for NOKIA LUMIA 520...best phone ever. Flipkart has been nice to send a replacement for the same. Thanks for this. I hope that the same phone works...wish that now.
It's a good phone within 10k range. Sometimes get's hanged, otherwise works good. The sound quality is amazing......................................................................................................................................................................................................
the phone goes half dead if you place a live wall paper on desk top.after screen idle state the phone needs gatorade to come to life. you shake nudge knock the damn thing it won’t budge like a sullen unhappy under fed donkey of a dhobhi. its like a tube light- takes time to light up. why call it a smartphone,i wonder? if there’s a word to describe its state of mind - it is ‘retard’. it should be called a smart-wannabe-retard phone. the screen is too small- you often miss every word you typo. the resolution is old nokia keyboard black and white rs 1100/- standard. if you run a game the game goes for a bathroom break. silly phone that pretends its got mojo under its belt - all it’s got is air. the touch interface makes you feel you are trying to do foreplay to a frigid, alcohol-numbed, oversexed and underpaid madam of the HOUSE. if you are ugly the camera will prove it. if you are beautiful the camera will prove you otherwise. you can’t do video chat. come’n man, go spend a couple of extra bucks and ditch this disaster. even a Chinese cheap-stakes feels better under the bedsheets.
If you thing this phone is better then Windows 8 Lumia 520 then compare it. Even it come with open-sourced Android it have less spec. Here is spec of Lumia 520 5MP primary camera with 4x digital zoom, auto focus, touch focus, landscape orientation, still image editor, auto and manual exposure, active toolbar, full screen viewfinder, geotagging, auto and manual white balance 4-inch IPS display super sensitive touchscreen with 480 x 800 pixels resolution Windows Phone 8 operating system with Qualcomm Snapdragon S4 dual core 1GHz processor and memory expandable up to 64GB 1430mAH battery providing talk-time of 14.8 hours on 2G and 9.6 hours on 3G networks and standby time of 360 hours on 3G networks 1 year manufacturer warranty for device and 6 months manufacturer warranty for in-box accessories including batteries from the date of purchase
i m very happy with this phone...because i m not game addicted..i m using chat and other application and working fine..ya processor is slow if u play game phone will be slow... but it ok when u use fb what app and other applications...
FULL REVIEW OF XPERIA E (SINGLE), Bought this mobile for 8280rs from flipkart last month :-) first of all i thank flipkart for good packing and delivering the product in good condition no transits breakage issues with the product, but i was very much disappointed with the delivery i ordered this product on JULY 10th and got it on 17th very bad got after 7 days still i am living in a main place of the city SONY XPERIA E WHITE :- first i hesitated to buy white color bcoz it'll get dirty soon, after i got the mobile it really looked awesome u really get a royal look out of it, BUT guys u really need to use a pouch or a flip cover or something to cover the mobile with becoz being white in color it gets dirtier soon OS :- 4.1.1 jelly bean it feels really nice to have the latest android OS in your mobile Processor :- 1 GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon which is quite enough and does not lag Display :- its a scratch resist display so no need of scratch guards or screen guards 3.5 Inches Resolution HVGA, 320 x 480 Pixels bit ok with it. only thing is pixels is quite low but still gives a good viewable experience at this range of 8k mobiles 320x480 pixels is fine Camera :- its not actually 3.2mp its 3.15mp cam (source sony website) bit ok not so impressive again sony has made it very simple with the camera yeah i accept the fact that this is 8k range mobile so very have to accept the fact i give 7 out of 10 points for the camera the is no flash for the camera which is one of the -ve point Weight : 115.7g not too much weight its nice to have in the pocket very easy to carry Battery : if u charge 100% it stands for 1.5 days which includes call msging few games normal usage it will surely stand a maximum of 1.5 days or even 2 days battery drains a lot when u use mobile internet or internet via wi-fi games does not kill much battery its normal battery drain when we play games MEMORY : internal 4gb only 2.3gb usable which is quite usually we see mostly in few android phones :) expandable 32gb now im currently using 16gb sony memory card is this mobile and i've loaded it with 10gb data in it no lag nothing works fine :-)))))) this phone has 512mb RAM which is ok :))) 1gb ram would have been more helpful Internet :- i got free 1gb 3g Data from airtel when i purchased this mobile 3g speed is nice and in wifi their is no connectivity issues everything works fine :))) Navigation Technology :- A-GPS, with Google Maps one of the coolest thing in this mobile i loved it Walkman music :- only one word to say its awesome :))))) Additional Features :- it has a proximity sensor their is a notification LED at the top near the earpiece which is really cool whenever u miss to see a msg or a phone call the indicator light starts to glow with blue color which denotes that we have got a misscal or a msg which is not viewed yet one of the coolest thing in this mobile if the battery is low its glows to red color and when fully charged it shows green color one more coolest thing in this mobile is there is a LED strip at the bottom which really makes the phone look very cool :))) almost all sony phones have it when u set the theme to green color that led turns to green blue theme u get blue color at nights when dark its lovely to see ( i felt like i had my sony W580i back few years back i used it and i loved those cool LED lights ) Color changes for every song u change in walkman there is a lot of WIDGETS in the phone :))) Freebies :- i got a Free Sony Headset ( MDR-ZX100A) its really really awesome guys very nice to hear songs curently am using it for laptop oops :P ( when u use this headphone please avoid listening songs at full volume bcoz it will surely harm your eardrums ) OVERALL i loved my new SONy Xperia E really felt satisfied nearly after one month of usage if u really need a branded high quality coolest and great looking cellphone at 8.5k just close your eyes and buy this phone :)))))) only disappointment was flipkart took too much time to deliver the product LATE DELIVERY :@@@@@@ hope my review helped :) Cheers
The packing was good and I also got a headset free with this phone - In all this phone is, value for money. - This portion is written to satisfy a minimum of 200 characters condition; this condition is absurd :) -
I have received the product within 3 days and as we know that flipkart is awesome packing and the product was quite safe .the features are really gud with this price I love to shop in flipkart .most probably in some cities the mobile price is littte bit high in price when compared to this price
i would say it is a an average buy. can't recommend for a good buy. camera picture quality is n't good. loud speaker audio output is too low. touch sensitivity is OK, not smooth, the feeling is not great. the back cover is very much rubberish... didn't like this either, call quality is also not good, some times, not audible.... the phone has become slow now... due to photos i believe....
Having read the reviews of the phone i had hoped that it would be a good buy. But it is really disappointing that the phone keeps hanging while using it for the simplest functions possible like calling and messaging. The phone's calling quality is not great and the sound disappears unexpectedly in the middle of a call. A highly disappointing buy.
fellas! xperia e is a budget android phone wid not too great specs as compared to others in the market, but a good music phone. music lovers will love the quality of xloud and walkman, but 10 band equaliser would have helped instead of the routine 5 band. if the price drops by another 1000, it will b a cool deal. currently just a little steep , but die hard music lovers can shell out a little xtra...
Awesome phone with great packed features: 7.2 Mbps HSDPA and 5.76 Mbps HSUPA 3.5" 256K-color capacitive TFT touchscreen of HVGA resolution (320 x 480) Android OS v4.1.1 Jelly Bean 1 GHz Cortex-A5 CPU, Adreno 200 GPU, Qualcomm MSM7227A chipset 3.15 MP fixed-focus camera, geo-tagging User-accessible battery, Li-Ion 1530 mAh But Feeble chipset and uninspiring performance Mediocre screen quality Fixed-focus camera, No LED flash Video recording No front-facing camera . And it is deliverd by flipkart in 2 days, hats-off
It's a must buy,if you want to buy a budget phone. Looks great and works fine. Battery back up is decent and touch screen is cool too. Comes with jelly bean. You may not like the display very much but music quality is superb! Camera is just OK. It comes with a nice headset. I loved it !! It's headphones are also very good. overall...a great android phone in this range!! Go for it!
sony experia could not live upto the hype it created because first of all inspite of having a 3.2 mp camera its picture quality is not at all good(even samsung wave 525 had a fur fur better pic quality at 3.2 mp) and when it comes to the battery back up its just pathetic:-( just now u charge it and the next moment u see that it has lost some( even without any usage),this is truely agonising:-( the sound quality is fair enough,it even offerred a free rs 1500 worth headphone that can even be connected to a pc:-) the browsing is good, supports good games like temple runs and subway surfer but the problem is the phone gets heated up pretty fast!!!!!!! overall the phone is good for falunting but in terms of real usage it scores a bit poorly..anyway at 9000 rs u can still give it a try!!!!!!
Bought this phone 15 days back ! Till now, it has been a good experience. Jelly Bean is really good to use. The audio quality is good and it also came with a free Sony Headset. The Battery easily lasts more than a day on light to medium usage. Camera quality not good,but what can you expect from a latest Android phone at this price ? Performance is average.Good,not great. Phone can play games like Temple Run 2,Frontline Commando etc without any lag. Overall, a decent Android phone at this price. Definitely better than the Htc Desire C which has lower benchmarks than Xperia E and hangs a lot.
I HV PUCHASED IT ON 11 JULY AND AFTER TWO DAYS USED ITS CHARGER WORST...........................................................................................................................................................?????????????????????????????
in discription state that it has 4 GB internal memory.. But it is wrong. it has only 2GB internal memory .. The remaing function is satisfied the peoples. peoples just point out this point. thank u
It's pretty good phone for the price, surprisingly plays games better than expected. No issues whatsoever. The phone is small which for some people is a good thing. The display could have been better. Compare it with Samsung, lg and htc's equivalent, sony wins hands down.
its a very good buy for the mentioned price.you'll love it first of all it comes with jelly bean which is the latest android software and also it is able to handle multitasks.camera is good and gaming,music,texting etc are also good.toch resistivity is absolutely fine.there are some preloaded apps too.keeping the offer in mind its a very good deal. what i felt was the display and brightness could have been slightly better. remember,its a budget phone so overall its a good buy :)
This is my first smartphone and two months on,I AM pretty happy with it. Games and apps work smoothly. I got a pink one and absolutely love its sleek and stylish look. Videos play well. Camera (though 3.5MP) delivers clear pictures. Sound clarity on calls is good.And the major plus point is that true to its name,Sony delivers outstanding audio quality. Especially with the headphones on,listening to music on this one is a great experience. From a girly point of view,I love the small light on top which blinks red when there is a missed call or low battery,blue when there is a sms,pinkish yellow when there is a message on watsapp and green when the battery is fully charged :) Its easy to carry(lightweight) and easier to use.Touchscreen is not over-sensitive and the battery life is good. The only cons I found was that the vibration mode is weak..many a times..we dont realise that the phone is ringing when kept in pockets or hand purse.Also it hangs for few seconds once in a while,but I guess this is common for almost all smartphones.Given the budget,Xperia E is a good buy. All in all a 4star for this one :)
nice phone and perfect working no lags while using apps and playing game. response is also nice but there was no auto focus in this phone and they are saying it has it disappointed. otherwise walkman player is really good and android 4.1 in this budget is good and i got sony MDR-ZX100A which is awesome quality was superb work with my all device
I thought of buying the phone from flipkart as it had very good offers (till yesterday) which included a Sony Headset ( MDR-ZX100A) and also a 8GB Memory Card free with the phone. When i visited the website today to order the phone, the offers were changed. :( Now why would I buy it from filpkart when the local dealer is offering it for the same price as flipkart and also with a Screen Guard.
first of all heads of to sony for launching a phone with so good features in such a good price only the ram is bit small 512 .. but ... other than that the phone is good .. but one thing to mention .. other phones does not provide 4 gb internal memory in such a low cost which other phones cannot do .. this is my first time i have purchased sony .. i never used to like sony phones ... my family my friends circle all using sony phones . but i used to used blackberry .. but now i am also an user of sony .... i have gifted this phone to my sis in law ..as well as my cousin sister .. 8 months ago ... guys dont think for it .. just go for the piece .....
I am being using this phone for a month now the battery back up is really good. With a average of few hours music, a few hrs internet and 1-2hours of telephone gives me a back up of almost 2days before the battery dies. The processor is good A5 cortex though a little old (but remember apple iPhone use to use cortex A5) but still performs well it takes some time to load apps but the apps runs smooth unless and untill you have more then 8-9apps opened simultaneously. The camera is decent. Screen is fine but viewing angles are really poor and under the sunlight it is hardly visible. But its not a big deal for me. I am happy with the product and i am using sony phones from 7years no way any other brand can beat it, Last phone was galaxy 3 and i regret buying it. 5Star for this product.
I have been using this phone for quite a few days. the price was quite good and i was Amazed how Electronics Giant like SONY can make a smartphone so Cheap & great. First of all i will start with Looks, as usual SONY does't disappoint in terms of looks. it may be not glamorous looking phone but if you look closely its still great. it comes with Android 4.1(JellyBean) & Touch interface is quite smooth and some people are complaining about it being slow sometimes but it can be solved by stop 'Running' Apps in background in settings... SOUND is quite great and it comes with classical 'WALKMAN' app, its got CLEAR voice even when you are in a crowded place. Battery back up is great even after using hours of WiFi, 3G or GPRS/EDGE or Bluetooth. Whats Great is that it comes with a on-ear Headphones which is a Heaven for Music lover. Overall a Good Performance phone with a limited Budget..SONY has done a tremendous Job and has added me in their FAN list.
If you just go with hardware specifications many phones @around-20k looks better than apple iphone5, but actually not. What is very important is, ease of use and build quality and offcourse the price. Lumia phones use windows phone 8 which is known to be far inferior to android. I am one of the victims of the WP8 through lumia520. WP8 is pathetic, no file manager, no sufficient applications(for ex: opera mini is not available,you are forced to use IE which is a bad browser), no enough settings, and you need a training to learn using WP8, i mean it is not at all user friendly. To put it simply, you can not compare xperiaE which has android and Sony's build quality with lumia520 which has WP8 and average build quality (though it is from Nokia, build quality is not at normal Nokia level, for ex. My lumia 520 becomes 3 parts- back lid, battery, and the phone even if it fell down from 1 feet height)
I have been using Xperia E for a month. Brought it after reading all the rewiews. Did I make a mistake of choosing this phone?! Well yes...This phone is really horrible. I will tell you why -Phones lags every now, can't work on it peacefully. -Because of the lag, I can't even answer the call. -Some times my phone just can't be unlocked. -Tried reset but still lags even without installing any software's. I want SONY to take this phone back, they just insulted their brand.
Guys...This phone is only good to watch and when it comes to usage its a waste......It eats up a lot of ram and some unnecessary processes run behind.The battery backup is not so good.The screen size is also small for a Rs 10000 cell.They say camera is 3.5 mp but it works like a VGA one!!!!.It has no Flash which anyone would expect for a mobile with more than 3 mp camera.The phone is expert at hanging sometimes...This phone should not be of Rs 10000/- but only Rs 5000-6000/. Sony phones are usually music phones but this phone's music is not at all loud.......So please if your budget is Rs 10000 go for canvas or lumia 520......
Just bought this phone from flipkart. Got an additional 05% discount.The phone was delivered well within 05 days. I am pleasantly surprised as to how Sony could manufacture a good product at such a less price. Generally,all sony products are smashingly overpriced. Phone contains all the specs mentioned and also has a good call quality.Sound quality for music is also good. It is only the screen resolution which dampens the spirit. I was using Xperia X10 before and that smartphone lasted for three years. I had bought it in the United Kingdom, and since then I have become a big fan of Sony Products. Phone is good, you get necessary apps and also you can download apps of your choice from the store. But, there are unnecessary apps which show appreciation to Salman Khan, SRK and Kareena which are totally useless. Just uninstalled those, it will fix lags to some extent. Battey is also good, I generally charge after 36 hours everyday, and I use it heavily. Sony headset is attractive, you also get earphones besides the headset. Rest, all in all a good phone.You will not get anything better at this price which will work more than a basic phone, will be categorized as a smartphone and offer a brand value. Buy this product, use it for a year.....and the use value satisfied.
Slow....hangs frequently. the lower touch buttons...some times u need to press frequently... previously used HTC desire C....what a phone that was...this phone is way way behind that in prformance... it has good features...but it leaves u unsatisfied.... but one thing which impressed me is that...even though there is no flash click a night time pic in dim light and try fill light option in edit photo....it gives u the view of pic taken with flash with awesome clarity... there is no zoom facility in camera...atleast thats a basic feature which even a 800 rupee phone would give... :(
Got this Xperia E about a month ago and i'm quite satisfied with its performance Lacks a front cam and flash but dats wat u can expect at this low price. The body is sleek n slim dats easy to hold and operate with a single hand. Android Jelly bean runs smooth. May get slow sometimes but ES task manager will solve the issue. Battery is good and can last for a whole day with average surfing, whatsapp and a few calls. The camera is not that great but its more than average for Daylight conditions. Since the display resolution is low games look a bit pixelated(but they dont lag). Videos play without any problem. Install MX player to play 720p videos smoothly. The walkman and Album app are great. There is an LED lamp at the bottom that changes color with the album art or the image being viewed. aGPS is good and powerful. I tried it during train journeys and it gave good results. Dont compare it Micromax plastic toys since the sound quality of Sony Xperia E is the BEST!!!!!! and not with Lumia 520 since Lumia imposes lot of restrictions on sharing media. Go for it if u are a music lover and want a budget android phone with features comparable to other costly phones
This is the best budget phone for a student... If you need of a cell phone, you should definitely go for this one... I got this after i got my result (THANX TO DAD) You WON'T REGRET BUYING THIS PHONE. Although, it it does not have some important features like flah, voice recorder and all but still I RECOMMEND.!!!!
I was on the lookout for a budget smart phone that doesn't disappoint me on touch navigation and screen resolution. No big bazookas, No big gaming module was needed. I own a Xperia X8 and was mighty impressed with it and so decided in favor of brand Sony, as against our home brew brands. Was I disappointed. No. Am I happy. Not really. The first thing that turned me off, before turning on the phone was the cheap plastic back cover. Second the display was bit let down. The three hard buttons are neither buttons nor soft keys and has it's own mind. Sometimes works on one touch, sometimes needs multiple touches. The software is bloated with Love-with-Kareena crap. Kareena, seriously Sony ! Now that you have Kat, why not try something like Love with Katrina. May work out not so pathetic. I wish the software was more toned and mature, but then I have the iOS at the back of my mind. Overall, I suggest you buy this only if you have to. I'm sure there are better phones out there for this price point.
Pros - Battery is really good as compared to other smartphone internal Memory of 4GB.. however, you’ll only get a little over 1.9 GB for your use. Cons - No LED flashlight The display is not good, especially when you are under direct sunlight, it's almost impossible to see anything on the screen Video playback is not so good only 3.2 megapixel camera no flash!
Xperia E is certainly a nice phone at this price as evident from the maker 'Sony'. But if you are heading to buy this phone at once, then please be calm and think again. Nokia Lumia 520 (of same range) has much more features than this as compared against. Just have a quick look- FEATURE---------------------SONY XPERIA E----------------------------NOKIA LUMIA 520 Processor---------------------1 Ghz (Single Core)------------------------1 Ghz(Dual Core) OS------------------------------Android Jell Bean 4.1----------------------Windows phone 8 Display-------------------------3.5 inch---------------------------------------4.0 inch Resolution---------------------HVGA 320x480------------------------------WVGA 480x800 Display Color-----------------263 K------------------------------------------16 Million colors Camera------------------------3.2 MP-----------------------------------------5 MP Video Recording-------------640x480---------------------------------------720x1280 HD Thickness---------------------11mm-------------------------------------------9.9mm Exp memory------------------32GB--------------------------------------------64 GB 3G speed---------------------7.2mbps HSPDA------------------------------21.1mbps HSPDA supported video-------------3gp, 3gpp, mp4------------------------------3gp, 3gpp, mp4, avi, -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------mov, 3g2, avc, wmv, vc1 -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------asf, m4v, flv, swf 3D Glass Gaming-----------No----------------------------------------------Yes, 420Xvid RGB Anything left? Now you can make your choice! :)
i was in a dilemma whether to buy lumia 520 or xperia E.even i was attracted by lumia ...but,once i was got to use it,it imposed a boring effect of using a normal PC.it's sure that windows OS is faster than JB.but,enjoying variety i went for this phone and I'm enjoying that
This mobile not have a good performance of 1gh process and 512ram .Its very slow and not have a performance of jelly bean but its display clarity is well and have battery backup more than other android smart phones and good camera clarity but in night mode its very bad.....its not a good mobile .............................................................................................Its a total waste.................
JUST DON'T BUY IT. OTHERWISE YOU WILL REGRET. LUMIA 520 IS 100 TIMES BETTER THAN THIS AT EVERY ASPECT. I HAVE TO SOLD MY XPERIA E AT A LOSS OF RS 4000/- ONLY 2 DAYS AFTER I BOUGHT IT. NOW IM USING LUMIA 520 AND IM TOTALLY SATISFIED.
I have not purchased from flipkart..So cant tell about the services..but definitely this phone is worthless regarding its amount. Dont go for this phone. Hangs too much..!! Very slow phone..Once hanged no way of getting out without restarting..awful phone..
now this is for those comparing it with nokia 520 and tellin that nokia 520 is far better.. before starting off let me clear some misconceptions about xperia e - low ppi and viewing in daylight is difficult= well this is most common misconception i have read in many websites.. i beg to differ.. you only have to increase screen brightness and you will not face any difficult in reading on screen data under sunlight... second thing is that was the phone getting slighty heated up during charging.. now i have bought a back cover and i dont feel the heat now.. okay now lets start the comparision btwn nokia lumia 520 and xperia e- both are almost same priced.. nokia 520 has better specifications than xperia e.. os(operating system) and ui(user interface) -this is where xperia e beats lumia 520 by a huge margin.. those telling that games,apps playable on xperia e can also be found on windows store for lumia 520,i tell them that before commenting,you should have used xperia e,have imense knowledge about play store and windows store.. there is virtually an app for everything 0n android which u will not find on windows store.. i agree that play store has a lot of spam also but a little common sense while installing the app will make the user differentiate btwn a useful app and a spam app... next thing you will have to stick to the windows phone ui,but in android if u get bored of your phone ui then u can custom roms(themes) to change the look of the phone ui.. there is cyanogen mod available for now and custom roms will be developed in the coming days.. i was confused btwn xperia e and lumia 520 and i eventually went with wit xperia e.. my verdict for a 10k phone - if u are a normal user who wants good specifications and would stick with the same user interface with limited apps then nokia lumia 520 is for you.. if your a user who just wants to try variety of games,apps,.. if your someone who wnts to try something new on his/her phone whenevr he/she gets bored then xperia e is for you.. hope my comment clears the confusion
I bought this phone from a local store. At first i was beguiled by its cool design but as I have started using this phone, I HATE it!!! This phone is so slow...it keeps on hanging now and then. At times when there is an incoming call....the screen freezes and there is way i can receive the call. Also try doing multiple things on this phone and it starts freezing. The RAM space is so ridiculously low. Wonder why SONY even bothered to come out with such a phone. Instead of giving away the headsets worth 1500, they could have put in some effort on this phone. I am definitely staying away from any SONY product after this experience.
Hello All, Even though I brought this phone in a local store. I would like to share an Unbiased review about the product. Pros Excellent Sound Clarity. Audio is very clear on the call due to xloud feature. Music is awesome. Internet connectivity via Wi-fi is fast. Cons The display is not good, especially when you are under direct sunlight, it's almost impossible to see anything on the screen Vibration is not good, especially if it is in your trouser pocket. Phone lags a lot at random times. Some time it takes more then 20 to 30 seconds to open the contacts or the phone call list. The music gets lagged when you select Surround option. Works fine when the surround is not selected. For Gaming:: Temple run, Temple run 2, subway surfer etc.. Lags. You need to kill the other background process or restart the phone to play the game without lag for some time.
I purchased sony xperia E single sim two weeks back. The phone had a network issue.It would show out of network coverage area always, but the same SIM worked fine in other phones.I was forwarded to the service center. To my surprise the service center was jam packed!. Believe me it's a 10*10 room with more than 20 odd ppl- all customers with various problems. When inquired I got to knw that the entire Xperia series has some problem or d other. It's been 10 days and have not got back my mobile.Just thot ppl should knw.
Features, form and cost together appeared to be value for money for a segment of users and I thought it would satisfy my need. I am OK to continue with this phone if SONY can fix following two unexpected issues: 1) phone crashed (got rebooted) while initiating or trying to receive a call. 2) got "messaging stopped" thrice; one of the reboot was just after "messaging stopped" error message. I needed to reboot the phone to use the messaging.
I ordered this product and received after 2 days. No extra word for flipkart as it is their habit to deliver items within record timing. However after receiving the same, I found some “lagging” problem with the mobile set. Moreover, the signal bar was frequently showing "no signal". I informed the same to flipkart and yes!! They replaced the product within 3 days. It is now working fine. Regarding the phone: Pros: 1. Price.. It’s really cheap as you have the latest OS 2. Sound. Believe me.. it’s awesome.. and the free headphone.. it looks elegant with its white colour and the sound quality is studio like. 3. Battery is really good as compared to other smartphone 4. Internal Memory of 4gb.. however, you’ll only get a little over 1.9gb for your use. 5. Processor is decent 6. You can delete almost every pre installed unnecessary app except sony music and sony live.. 7. Basic games like angry birds runs smoothly. Since I am not a gamer, cant say about HD games Cons: 1. Though I never use, still camera is not good 2. Display is not good, specially when you are under direct sunlight, its almost impossible to see anything on the screen 3. Video playback is not so good 4. Since my job demands to keep it in silent mode very frequently, I found that vibration is not good, specially if it is in your trouser pocket. If you want to have a smartphone within a pocket friendly budget, I’ll recommend it for you.
Excellent phone at this price range.Only the video playback and camera are the weak points.The phone looks stylish.Can play games reasonably.Touch sensation also good.Has got good sound.Sometimes there is a lag.Notification sounds are not loud enough.
This is my first phone and its awesome....... Firstly the 1 gHz Qualcom Snapdragon processor and Adreno 200 gpu are mind blowing...runs most games without any lag...3.5 in touchscreen is expected at this price....Camera is Okayish..and the soud quality is superb due to xLoudTM.....Overall an out of the box..... Guys with budgets around 10K should definitely go for it....
A very gud and nice budget phone by sony in 10k..if u are searching within 10k budget then go for it.. i promise you will not regret for this!!..... 1.resolution is a little bit low but at this price it is ok. 2. sound quality is very good as it was sony.. 3. very handy 4. camera quality is ok at this price..
plus ........ 1.camara clarity superb.. 2.Battery back up is good.. 3.stylish look.. 4.Good sound for head phone.. 5.Android 4.1 is working excellent with browsing and games.. 6.Free Sony HeadSet...............................
Though I cud have purchased Nokia Lumia 520 by paying Rs 9 more, I opted for Xperia E instead as Sony is more reliable. I have installed ebook reader Aldiko and transferred all my collection of 300 books to excellent use. Got wordweb too installed. Truly, reading ebooks on xperia e an excellent experience. Music is out of the world with the free Free Sony Headset ( MDR-ZX100A), but most importantly gaming is the best part of the experience, which might be same with Nokia Lumia 520 as well. Xperia's noise suppression quality in traffic conditions and XLoud facility is noteworthy.
I got this mobile 5 days ago....from flipkart... its awesome mobile..from sony.. Battery is decent.... 1 ghz performs well to its potential... camera is decent... the free headphone sony is providing is just awesome.... jellybean is the highlight..... features which you know r not there b4 only cannot be cons....
I had too many mobile sets to buy when i thot f buyin a fne. Why xperia e? 1. Sony is the name and I like the superb look of this fone. 2.Sound superb and headset quality is awesome 3.Internal memory that can b used is nly 2gb of space and nt 4gb 4.poor camera 5.poor screen 6.a little slow response after touch 7.for 2nd thots i had HTC ,MMX, and so many other fnes in my mind. 8.but Sony atlst has its quality to make you believe and finally the price, best suited price. 9.Flipkart has superb delivery I got it within 2 days of ordering. 10. If u r looking for some mediocre fone @ this budget go for it. Gamers beware ,this fone is nt for u. Temple run2 , asphalt, angry birds works smooth. FIFA ,clear vision, Dead trigger little laggy. lastly it has got a single core 1ghz processor .for that its the best i blv.
First of all I appreciate the Flipkart's service excellence... Thanks for quick & quality service... About the phone, overall the phone is good (won't describe spces as they are available everywhere). Writing only things (everyone would be interested to know) which phone lacks, if you are okay with them you can go for this phone without any hesitation - 1. Most important, screen size is large but screen resolution lacks the crispiness (ppi ration is less) which I am used to, visibility in outdoors/sunlight is less 2. Primary camera resolution is little less so can't consider the phone to take memorable snaps 3. No secondary camera, video calling (Skype etc.) is possible but you will have to turn back the phone to show yourself on video to the party at other end and in turn you won't be able to see them :) One resolution could be sit in front of mirror ;) Except above the phone is good in terms of call quality, processor, memory, speed, latest Android OS, music, battery etc.
I am not sure if its the phone or the android version, but I feel terrible for buying this phone due to the dead slow response time. If i play a game for sometime, it slows down drastically. If i dont use the phone for sometime, it gets stuck for sometime. I purchased this phone after reading reviews which were positive. Now I am facing the real trouble. I somehow feel it is jelly bean 4.1 android which is slowing down because I have heard from other jelly bean users complaining that their phones are slow.
frst of all 5 stars..for da luk and feel of dis phone...(best feature:da led light colour changes wid da theme colour) now letz talk abt da main issue whch every1 is talkin' abt.... "does dis game support hd gaming???" yes..it does....and m' nt talkin abt doin' any tricks fr playin' thm...e.g. using Chainfire 3d... da google play store itself has made available games lyk ASPHALT 7,MORDERN WARFARE 4 ,frontline commando for dis phn...bt obviously they r paid... So whn google itself is providing hd games fr dis phn..the answer iz pretty clear...and da screen iz nt as bad as every1 is saying....if u increase da brightness level to 75%..u wud be easily able to see everything even in a bright sunny day..... [p.s:I bought dis phn 5hrs and 8 mins ago :D]...m' lovin' it.... cheers \m/
after using of 20days it was death(no power) and sony service is very poor and also it lags when play temple run2...also low camera and toooooo poor screen quality....heat generated...700mb(aprx)for apps...wast of money.....!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Have had this phone for a week now...its kinda good for the price...however it lags a little sometimes..but not a serious issue..other features are good..music is awesome (obviously, its a sony!) video is great..havent used it for gaming, so cant comment on that..the screen is sensitive, background light is good..camera is ok..no flash.. overall, a good affordable range smart phone..
firstof all thanks to flipkart for their best and safe packaging and delivery of product within time.it's a good phone with latest android version jelly beans.camera quality is low but 3.2 megapixel not so bad.its unable to play 720p or high definition The walkman app on on this smartphone is all about ease of use-great music.it has GPS with Google map with voice navigation. overall best smartphone in budget -
I am using this phone for a while now. Its more than what I expected. Pros: 1. Jelly Bean is just awesome. Previously I had Windows Mobile OS. Its much more convenient. Downloading and playing games smoothly. Loving whatsapp. 2. Touch screen is big (3.5). The phone looks premium. 3. The ph is fast enough to run multiple applications. Communication features run smoothly. Cons: 1. Camera is bad even in bright light. I dont mind it though, I rarely use camera. 2. Sound quality is nowhere near Sony LIVE with walkman. 3. Colors, resolution isnt of top notch quality. Overall at this price range, if you dont mind the camera, its a steal. My main purpose was communication. It scores 10/10 in that. Gaming is excellent also (first time I am playing so many games.) The phone looks much dearer than its 10k price tag. If you want a better phone, just buy a higher model of Xperia. Sony simply rocks. Its much better than my father's HTC at the same price range.
The Sony Xperia E is sleek, weightless and classy. The design is classy for its black color. Music playback is a pleasure. Scrolling is smooth, navigating through the home screen is smooth too. The 2 GB internal mass memory is enough for this budget smartphone. The only disadvantage I see in this phone is its low dpi. The screen resolution is low, and the display is not crisp. This phone rocks!
this is the most feature full phone at this price range 1-its jellybean 2-1ghz processor 3-512mb ram 4-good camera in daylight 5-games like temple run 2 ,subway surfers are playble like butter 6-heavy games can be played by turning on GPU rendring(its in settings you can turn it on or off anytime) 7-battery saver feature is also by stock(so no need to install any other battery saver) 8-battery is also good 9-dosent lag with jellbean at all 10-very much better than xperia tipo BUT there are few cons also 1-dosent give the feel of jellybean 2-camera is very poor in daylight 3-resolution is not very good but its ok for a phone at this price range its a very good entry level smartphone at this price range so go on and buy it and also very good delievery by flipkart and the headphone are brilliant too
Sony Experia E is a good Android mobile for low-budget users. Jelly Bean works very well on this machine and is very user-friendly for first-time Android users. Processor is fast enough. Display is sharp. There is no lag. Wi-Fi is fast enough, though it doesn't work when Mobile's signal connectivity is low, even if the Wi-Fi's signal strength is good. For moderate users, battery runs for 48 hours. Sound quality in music, video and in phone calls is amazing - very loud and clear. My friend called me from amidst heavy traffic and I could hear his voice clearly. The traffic noise got subdued. I am not a gaming freak, so can't comment on that. Screen is very touch-sensitive. I love the silken matte finish of the dark pink back cover. The mobile feels very smooth to hold in the hand. On-screen key board is very intuitive. I wish it would appear automatically while calling, as sometimes we have to dial numbers during a call to various service providers. Also, Control and Shift keys are not visible. The only thing I resent in this mobile is the bad camera - it's worse than the 2MP cameras I have had before in my 2-G Sony-Ericsson mobiles. The camera is absolutely unusable. Lack of flash and absence of front camera further restrict the use of this mobile. This need not have been so, as Sony could have provided a good back camera with flash and a good front camera instead of giving the 1500/- worth Sony Headset free. This is especially unfortunate because Sony makes excellent digital cameras. It's sad that a Sony mobile should lack in good cameras. I would have preferred to have good front and back cameras with flash rather then this free Sony headset. Otherwise, I have no complaints.
My first Android phone.. Phone is exceptionally good.. a competitor for nokia lumia 520(windows os in better form) cons i have observed so far : little lag , occasionally happens. Music player is good, but when i lock the phone(or locks by itself), the music starts to distort, even i lost the mood of hearing songs, but installed third party player and found the music delivery is good and more lucid than the company provided app. Same problem in xperia Z. And i don like the power button, feel so ductile sometimes. other than this no cons i found... go for it.. really good phone than samsungs droids.. got one amazing sony branded headset...
the fone is simply amazing with all the features. lightening fast on wi-fi and fairly good on 3G. It has all the basic features which one needs today in a smart fone. Only thing tht disappoints me a bit is its battery backup. It drains very fast if u use GPS navigation or play videos. Its been a week n im getting a battery backup of about 1 day with 8 hrs connected on wi-fi. I wish it had been better. Otherwise its music quality, display n all is superb. Body is excellent and with internal usable memory= 2GB, this makes it class apart in the range.
Let us compare the Sony Xperia E with the Micromax Canvas 2. 1- Processor Sony Xperia E- 1 GHz Single Core Snapdragon Micromax Canvas 2- 1 GHz Dual Core MediaTek 2- Display Sony Xperia E- 3.5 inch 320x480pixels LCD Micromax Canvas 2- 5 inch 480x854pixels LCD 3- RAM Sony Xperia E- 512 MB Micromax Canvas 2- 512 MB 4- Camera Sony Xperia E- 3.15MP Camera, VGA Recording, NO LED FLASH Micromax Canvas 2- 8MP Camera, 720p HD Recording, DUAL LED FLASH 5- Internal Memory Sony Xperia E- 4 GB around 1.5 GB user available(not sure) Micromax Canvas 2- 4GB around 2 GB user available 6- GPU Sony Xperia E- Adreno 200 Micromax Canvas 2- MediaTek Power VGR GX544 7- Android Version Sony Xperia E- 4.1.2 (4.0.2 for dual version) Micromax Canvas 2- 4.0.2 (4.1.2) if you buy it now. 8- Media Sony Xperia E- Has the xLoud feature, 3D surround and custom equaliser. Micromax Canvas 2- Has 3D surround and custom equaliser. 9- Video Playback Sony Xperia E- 480p plays smooth, 720p is not so smooth. Micromax Canvas 2- 720p plays smooth as butter, 1080p plays with MX Player 10- BATTERY Sony Xperia E- 1500 mAh Micromax Canvas 2- 2000mAh Conclusion:- Do I need to write a conclusion you all decide it's your hard earned money. Think wisely before you buy.
I think this phone is simply awesome. People say that the resolution is less but i think it is fairly well and it also has awesome sound quality. The music may sometimes lag in club mode. But i think it is the best in its category. The best thing i like is the default and inbuilt swiftkey which is just awesome.
I got the phone within 24 hours of order :) Phone is superb. I have bought this phone as a gift to my wife. Amazing features to get at this price. Operating Freq GSM - 850, 900, 1800, 1900; UMTS - 2100 OS Android v4.1 (Jelly Bean) User Interface Timescape Processor 1 GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon DISPLAY Type TFT Size 3.5 Inches Resolution HVGA, 320 x 480 Pixels Color 262 K Other Display Features Scratch Resistant, Gesture Input, Auto Rotate, Pinch-to-Zoom, Multi-touch (Upto 2 Fingers Supported)
Pros jelly bean out of the box price under 10k 3.5inch display X loud audio 1 ghz snapdragon proccessor Good Loud speaker performance cons only 3.2 megapixel camera no flash ............ this phone is capable of playing casual games and some high end games!!! im enjoying using this phone right know. you wont get these features for a phone under 10k, from a world class brand like sony!!
Just An Awesome Mobile With a Lots Of New Features :) Just Love It . I Used It For 5 Days And According To Me For Camera Lover Its Not Atall A Good Mobile Camera Quality Is Very Very Poor :( Just 3.2 Mp Camera And Due To Low Resolution Its Not Good So Forget About CamRecording Otherwise Its An Awesome Mobile With Good Speed Processing,Good Application Suports . For Gaming It Just More Than Perfect One . So According To Me f You Are Not A Camera Lover Just Go For It Its A Good Mobile To Hang Out With its battery is 1500 mh Which Is Very Good I Used It For 1-2 Days. MUSIC Is AwSuM with 3d surround sound and X loud TECHNOLOGY, and 3.5 inch screen With Hd Quality Videos Just Love It Conc- Just Go For It If You Are Not A Camera Lover I Repeate :)
i am reviewing this phone after using for almost a week and my conclusion is PROS 3.5 inch screen 1 ghz snapdragon s1 processor ram 512 mb i know its a bit less but still its from a reputed company and also an entry level phone so its OKAY MUSIC Is AwSuM with 3d surround sound and X loud TECHNOLOGY, and believe me xloud increases the voice by over 30 % free sony headsets (same ones which are now given free on xperia z) it could also play sum cool games like tr2(temple run 2),subway surfer,dead trigger etc ................................................................................................................................. CONS the biggest thing that worries me is its resolution and colour reproduction quality its just 262k camera, even though 3.2 mp couldnt take very good shots and very minimal ie basic settings are there like contrast and scene mode No flash battery: its battery is 1500 mh but still it drains to fast over moderate gaming also the phone heats up very quickly while playing moderate to high graphics games like modern combact 4 etc .................................................................................................................................so why go for this phone????? in ma opinion i wanted a mobile which could do good gaming cuz m a game freak and also for texting and music in which this phone out performs others like htc desire c ,and some chinese brands like mmx ,karbonn,celkon so ppl going for this criteria do go for this phone i bet it wont disappoint you
If everyone think this is the best phone at this price or the Dual sim version, then think twice after what m writing. Nokia Lumia 520 which is just launched is the best among-st all smartphones of this range.. Experia E vs. Lumia 520 ---> 1Ghz processor in both.. But wait, Experia is single core, while Lumia dual core. ............................................................................................................................. --->Size 3.5 Inches Resolution HVGA, 320 x 480 Pixels Color-262 K in Experia e while Size 4 Inches Resolution-WVGA, 800 x 480 Pixels, Color-16 M. ................................................................................................................................ --->comming to os- no doubt jelly bean is the best in android, but hey its windows 8, the most stable os. And regarding apps, Android have 600,000apps, while windows touched 130,000 apps. But look- http://www.gsmarena.com/windows_phone_apps_on_the_rise_in_the_coming_year-news-5797.php 6 out of 10 free apps are bogus in android, and 6 out of 10 apps are very good in win 8. So the apps problem is resolved. U cannot install more than 50-60 good apps, hence 600,000 is useless.. ............................................................................................................................... --->Memory wont be a problem either since both phones are giveing internally 4gb memory, while xperia is giving 32gb expandable, and Lumia 520=64gb. Memory resolved. ................................................................................................................................ ---> comming to sensitivity. The touch screen of Lumia can be used wearing gloves also, while in experia E, this is absent. Cool nah?? ............................................................................................................................... --->Lumia in association with Windows giving three best features- Skydrive, Nokia offline maps and 3D mapping with street lens, and Nokia HERE. Best stuffs for a phone. How much do u all need? The only thing is people are not having the confidence, Go for it, ur money wont be in loss. ............................................................................................................................... I hope i cud clarify all ur queries, I knwo android lovers will dislike my post, and hate me.. But Experia at price of 8000-8500 would have been a good buy. Because u can get Lumia 520 at Rs. 10,500. And then flipkart will reduce it. :)
Excellent phone! Doesn't lag. Good for gaming. Pros: Jellybean! Google Now Excellent sound quality Sharp display in spite of low resolution (320x480) and colour (262k) Most of the extra pre installed apps can be deleted. This is not true for many other phones where you can't delete the pre installed apps unless you root your phone. Cons: No Gorilla Glass - But the screen is scratch resistant No front facing camera No LED flashlight The screen resolution is not that great but I can't say it's bad. Everything comes for a price, and for this price, the Xperia E is one of the best phones in the market right now!
1GB processor-Very good 512MB ram-Very good 3.2 Camera- good Very good phone for gaming. Battery Backup is also good as compared to other sony n samsung product....There is nt any hidden facts about battery backup like other company
The Sony Xperia E is an Android smartphone manufactured by Sony. The Xperia E is powered by a 1 GHz single core processor (Qualcomm Snapdragon S1 MSM7227A). The phone has 512 MB RAM and an Adreno 200 GPU. This mobile phone is the successor of Sony Xperia Tipo. Pros:: 3.5-inch (480 x 320 pixels) TFT capacitive touch screen display 1GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon MSM7227A processor Adreno 200 GPU (for graphics and gaming) Timescape UI Scratch Resistant 512MB RAM 4GB internal storage, up to 32GB expandable memory with microSD 3.2-megapixel rear camera Xperia E - Android 4.1 (Jelly Bean) 3G, Bluetooth, WiFi b/g/n, DLNA, GPS / aGPS 1530 mAh battery Free Headset (for limited period of time) Cons:: Resolution is bit less but it is OK at this price. No front camera No flash For Gaming:: It can play casual games like angry birds, temple run, temple run 2, subway surfer etc. without any lag. It can also play high end games like dead trigger, gta 3, etc. but it will skip few frames(means its ill be a bit laggy). Conclusion:: It is a good mobile from Sony at this price.
